Illinois, session 104th, HB5517.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 5changing Sections 2, 3, 3.1, 6, 6.3, 6.6, 7.1, 8, 8.1, 8.2, 68.3, and 9.2 and by adding Sections 3.3 and 9.3 as follows: 7    (50 ILCS 705/2)  (from Ch. 85, par. 502)8    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 9context otherwise requires:10    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 11by the Board in the applicant's application file or the law 12enforcement officer's certification file, as maintained by the 13Board.14    "Basic training school" means any school located within 15the State of Illinois whether privately or publicly owned 16which offers a course in basic law enforcement or county 17corrections training and has been approved by the Board. 18    "Board" means the Illinois Law Enforcement Training 19Standards Board.20    "Chief executive officer" means the highest-ranking 21officer within a law enforcement agency. "Chief executive 22officer" includes police chiefs and police superintendents.23    "Court security officer" has the meaning given to that   HB5517- 2 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1term in Section 3-6012.1 of the Counties Code.2    "County corrections officer" means any sworn officer of 3the sheriff who is primarily responsible for the control and 4custody of offenders, detainees, or inmates.5    "Deputy Director" means the Deputy Director of the 6Certification Enforcement Unit. 7    "Full-time law enforcement officer" means a law 8enforcement officer who has completed the officer's 9probationary period and is employed on a full-time basis as a 10law enforcement officer by a local government agency, State 11government agency, or as a campus police officer by a 12university, college, or community college. 13    "Law enforcement Enforcement agency" means any entity with 14statutory police powers and the ability to employ individuals 15authorized to make arrests. It does not include the Illinois 16State Police as defined in the State Police Act. A law 17enforcement agency includes may include any entity associated 18with a university, college, or community college that employs 19individuals with statutory police powers. 20    "Law enforcement officer" means (i) any person who because 21of the person's office or public employment is primarily 22responsible for prevention or detection of crime and the 23enforcement of the criminal, traffic, or highway laws or 24ordinances of this State or any political subdivision of this 25State or (ii) any member of a police force appointed and 26maintained as provided in Section 2 of the Railroad Police   HB5517- 3 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1Act. "Law enforcement officer" does not include a court 2security officer or a county corrections officer. 3    "Local law enforcement agency" means any law enforcement 4unit of government or municipal corporation in this State. It 5does not include the State of Illinois or any office, officer, 6department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency of 7the State, except that it does include a State-controlled 8university, college or public community college.9    "State law enforcement agency" means any law enforcement 10agency of this State. This includes any office, officer, 11department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency of 12the State. It does not include the Illinois State Police as 13defined in the State Police Act.14    "Panel" means the Decertification Certification Review 15Panel established under Section 3.1. 16    "Part-time law enforcement officer" means a law 17enforcement officer who has completed the officer's 18probationary period and is employed on a part-time basis as a 19law enforcement officer or as a campus police officer by a law 20enforcement agency.21    "Permanent county corrections officer" means a county 22corrections officer who has completed the officer's 23probationary period and is permanently employed on a full-time 24basis as a county corrections officer by a participating law 25enforcement agency.26    "Permanent court security officer" means a court security   HB5517- 4 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1officer who has completed the officer's probationary period 2and is employed as a court security officer by a participating 3law enforcement agency.4    "Permanent law enforcement officer" means a law 5enforcement officer who has completed the officer's 6probationary period and is permanently employed on a full-time 7basis as a local law enforcement officer, as a security 8officer, or campus police officer permanently employed by a 9law enforcement agency.10    "Probationary county corrections officer" means a recruit 11county corrections officer required to successfully complete 12initial minimum basic training requirements at a basic 13training school to be eligible for permanent employment on a 14full-time basis as a county corrections officer.15    "Probationary court security officer" means a recruit 16court security officer required to successfully complete 17initial minimum basic training requirements at a designated 18training school to be eligible for employment as a court 19security officer. 20    "Probationary part-time police officer" means a recruit 21part-time law enforcement officer required to successfully 22complete initial minimum part-time training requirements to be 23eligible for employment on a part-time basis as a local law 24enforcement officer. 25    "Basic training school" means any school located within 26the State of Illinois whether privately or publicly owned   HB5517- 5 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1which offers a course in basic law enforcement or county 2corrections training and has been approved by the Board.3    "Probationary police officer" means a recruit law 4enforcement officer required to successfully complete initial 5minimum basic training requirements at a basic training school 6to be eligible for permanent full-time employment as a local 7law enforcement officer.8    "Reasonable basis" means there is sufficient information 9and available evidence from which a reasonable person could 10conclude that the officer engaged in decertification conduct 11under Section 6.3. 12    "Probationary part-time police officer" means a recruit 13part-time law enforcement officer required to successfully 14complete initial minimum part-time training requirements to be 15eligible for employment on a part-time basis as a local law 16enforcement officer.17    "Permanent law enforcement officer" means a law 18enforcement officer who has completed the officer's 19probationary period and is permanently employed on a full-time 20basis as a local law enforcement officer, as a security 21officer, or campus police officer permanently employed by a 22law enforcement agency.23    "Part-time law enforcement officer" means a law 24enforcement officer who has completed the officer's 25probationary period and is employed on a part-time basis as a 26law enforcement officer or as a campus police officer by a law   HB5517- 6 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1enforcement agency.2    "Law enforcement officer" means (i) any police officer of 3a law enforcement agency who is primarily responsible for 4prevention or detection of crime and the enforcement of the 5criminal code, traffic, or highway laws of this State or any 6political subdivision of this State or (ii) any member of a 7police force appointed and maintained as provided in Section 2 8of the Railroad Police Act.9    "Recruit" means any full-time or part-time law enforcement 10officer or full-time county corrections officer who is 11enrolled in an approved training course.12    "State law enforcement agency" means any law enforcement 13agency office, department, division, bureau, board, or 14commission of this State. "Law enforcement agency" does not 15include the Illinois State Police. 16    "Sufficient information" means facts that are alleged in 17the notice of alleged violation and that, if true, would 18constitute decertification conduct by an officer within the 19Board's jurisdiction and that are sufficient to identify the 20officer and to yield, upon further investigation, evidence 21that would either prove or disprove the allegation. 22    "Review Committee" means the committee at the Board for 23certification disciplinary cases in which the Panel, a law 24enforcement officer, or a law enforcement agency may file for 25reconsideration of a decertification decision made by the 26Board.  HB5517- 7 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    "Probationary county corrections officer" means a recruit 2county corrections officer required to successfully complete 3initial minimum basic training requirements at a basic 4training school to be eligible for permanent employment on a 5full-time basis as a county corrections officer.6    "Permanent county corrections officer" means a county 7corrections officer who has completed the officer's 8probationary period and is permanently employed on a full-time 9basis as a county corrections officer by a participating law 10enforcement agency.11    "County corrections officer" means any sworn officer of 12the sheriff who is primarily responsible for the control and 13custody of offenders, detainees or inmates.14    "Probationary court security officer" means a recruit 15court security officer required to successfully complete 16initial minimum basic training requirements at a designated 17training school to be eligible for employment as a court 18security officer.19    "Permanent court security officer" means a court security 20officer who has completed the officer's probationary period 21and is employed as a court security officer by a participating 22law enforcement agency.23    "Court security officer" has the meaning ascribed to it in 24Section 3-6012.1 of the Counties Code.25    "Trauma" means physical or emotional harm resulting from 26an event, series of events, or set of circumstances that has   HB5517- 8 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1led to lasting adverse effects on an individual's mental, 2physical, social, emotional, and spiritual well-being.3    "Trauma-informed response" means a program, organization, 4or system that is trauma-informed; realizes the widespread 5impact of trauma and understands potential paths for recovery; 6recognizes the signs and symptoms of trauma in clients, 7families, staff, and others involved with the system; and 8responds by fully integrating knowledge about trauma into 9policies, procedures, and practices, and seeks to actively 10avoid re-traumatization and to restore autonomy and stability 11to survivors. 12(Source: P.A. 104-159, eff. 1-1-26.) 13    (50 ILCS 705/3)  (from Ch. 85, par. 503)14    Sec. 3. Board; composition; appointments; tenure; 15vacancies. 16    (a) The Board shall be composed of 18 members selected as 17follows: The Attorney General of the State of Illinois, the 18Director of the Illinois State Police, the Director of 19Corrections, the Superintendent of the Chicago Police 20Department, the Sheriff of Cook County, the Clerk of the 21Circuit Court of Cook County, who shall serve as ex officio 22members, and the following to be appointed by the Governor: 2 23mayors or village presidents of Illinois municipalities, 2 24Illinois county sheriffs from counties other than Cook County, 252 managers of Illinois municipalities, 2 chiefs of municipal   HB5517- 9 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1police departments in Illinois having no Superintendent of the 2Police Department on the Board, 2 citizens of Illinois who 3shall be members of an organized enforcement officers' 4association, one active member of a statewide association 5representing sheriffs, and one active member of a statewide 6association representing municipal police chiefs. The 7appointments of the Governor shall be made on the first Monday 8of August in 1965 with 3 of the appointments to be for a period 9of one year, 3 for 2 years, and 3 for 3 years. Their successors 10shall be appointed in like manner for terms to expire the first 11Monday of August each 3 years thereafter. All members shall 12serve until their respective successors are appointed and 13qualified qualify. Vacancies shall be filled by the Governor 14for the unexpired terms. Any ex officio member may appoint a 15designee to the Board who shall have the same powers and 16immunities otherwise conferred to the member of the Board, 17including the power to vote and be counted toward quorum, so 18long as the member is not in attendance.19    (a-5) (Blank). Within the Board is created a Review 20Committee. The Review Committee shall review disciplinary 21cases in which the Panel, the law enforcement officer, or the 22law enforcement agency file for reconsideration of a 23decertification decision made by the Board. The Review 24Committee shall be composed of 9 annually rotating members 25from the Board appointed by the Board Chairman. One member of 26the Review Committee shall be designated by the Board Chairman   HB5517- 10 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1as the Chair. The Review Committee shall sit in 3 member panels 2composed of one member representing law enforcement 3management, one member representing members of law 4enforcement, and one member who is not a current or former 5member of law enforcement. 6    (b) When a Board member may have an actual, perceived, or 7potential conflict of interest or appearance of bias that 8could prevent the Board member from making a fair and 9impartial decision regarding decertification:10        (1) The Board member shall recuse himself or herself.11        (2) If the Board member fails to recuse himself or 12    herself, then the Board may, by a simple majority of the 13    remaining members, vote to recuse the Board member. Board 14    members who are found to have voted on a matter in which 15    they should have recused themselves may be removed from 16    the Board by the Governor.17    A conflict of interest or appearance of bias may include, 18but is not limited to, matters where one of the following is a 19party to a decision on a decertification or formal complaint: 20someone with whom the member has an employment relationship; 21any of the following relatives: spouse, parents, children, 22adopted children, legal wards, stepchildren, step parents, 23step siblings, half siblings, siblings, parents-in-law, 24siblings-in-law, children-in-law, aunts, uncles, nieces, and 25nephews; a friend; or a member of a professional organization, 26association, or a union in which the member now actively   HB5517- 11 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1serves.2    (c) A vacancy in members does not prevent a quorum of the 3remaining sitting members from exercising all rights and 4performing all duties of the Board.5    (d) An individual serving on the Board shall not also 6serve on the Panel. 7(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 8102-694, eff. 1-7-22.) 9    (50 ILCS 705/3.1)10    Sec. 3.1. Illinois Law Enforcement Decertification 11Certification Review Panel. 12    (a) There is hereby created the Illinois Law Enforcement 13Decertification Certification Review Panel. The Panel shall be 14composed of the following members, to be appointed in 15accordance with this Section no later than January 31, 2022 16(30 days after the effective date of Public Act 101-652) this 17amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly. An individual 18serving on the Panel shall not also serve on the Board.19        (1) The Governor shall appoint 4 members as prescribed 20    in this paragraph (1): one person who shall be an active 21    member from a statewide association representing State's 22    Attorneys; and 3 persons who shall be Illinois residents 23    who are from communities with disproportionately high 24    instances of interaction with law enforcement, as 25    indicated by a high need, underserved community with high   HB5517- 12 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    rates of gun violence, unemployment, child poverty, and 2    commitments to the Illinois Department of Corrections, but 3    who are not themselves law enforcement officers. The 4    initial appointments of the Governor shall be for a period 5    of 3 years. Their successors shall be appointed in like 6    manner for terms to expire the first Monday of June each 3 7    years thereafter. All members shall serve until their 8    respective successors are appointed and qualified qualify. 9    Vacancies shall be filled by the Governor for the 10    unexpired terms. Terms shall run regardless of whether the 11    position is vacant.12        (2) The Attorney General shall appoint 9 members as 13    prescribed in this paragraph (2). The membership shall 14    have racial, ethnic, gender, and geographic diversity and 15    include the following: 2 two persons who shall be active 16    members of statewide organization representing more than 17    20,000 active and retired law enforcement officers; one 18    person who shall be an active member of a statewide 19    organization representing more than 3,000 active and 20    retired law enforcement officials; one person who shall be 21    an active member of a statewide association representing a 22    minimum of 75 sheriffs; one person who shall be an active 23    member of a statewide association representing at least 24    200 municipal police chiefs; 2 two persons who shall be 25    active members of a minority law enforcement association; 26    one person who shall be a representative of the victims'   HB5517- 13 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    advocacy community but shall not be a member of law 2    enforcement; and one person who shall be a resident of 3    Illinois and shall not be an employee of the Office of the 4    Illinois Attorney General. The members shall serve for a 5    3-year term and until their respective successors are 6    appointed and qualified qualify. The members' successors 7    shall be appointed in like manner for terms to expire the 8    first Monday of June each 3 years thereafter. Any vacancy 9    of these positions shall be filled by the Attorney General 10    for the unexpired term. The term shall run regardless of 11    whether the position is vacant.12    (b) The Panel shall annually elect by a simple majority 13vote one of its members as chairperson and one of its members 14as vice-chairperson. The vice-chairperson shall serve in the 15place of the chairperson at any meeting of the Panel in which 16the chairperson is not present. If both the chairperson and 17the vice-chairperson are absent at any meeting, the members 18present shall elect by a simple majority vote another member 19to serve as a temporary chairperson for the limited purpose of 20that meeting. No member shall be elected more than twice in 21succession to the same office. Each member shall serve until 22that member's successor has been elected and qualified.23    (c) The Board shall provide administrative assistance to 24the Panel.25    (d) The members of the Panel shall serve without 26compensation but shall be entitled to reimbursement for their   HB5517- 14 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1actual and necessary expenses in attending meetings and in the 2performance of their duties hereunder.3    (e) Members of the Panel will receive initial and annual 4training that is adequate in quality, quantity, scope, and 5type, and will cover, at minimum, the following topics:6        (1) constitutional and other relevant law on 7    police-community encounters, including the law on the use 8    of force and stops, searches, and arrests;9        (2) police tactics;10        (3) investigations of police conduct;11        (4) impartial policing;12        (5) policing individuals in crisis;13        (6) Illinois police policies, procedures, and 14    disciplinary rules;15        (7) procedural justice; and16        (8) community outreach.17    The Board shall determine the content and extent of the 18training within the scope provided for by this subsection. 19    (f) The State shall indemnify and hold harmless members of 20the Panel for all of their acts, omissions, decisions, or 21other conduct arising out of the scope of their service on the 22Panel, except those involving willful or wanton misconduct. 23The method of providing indemnification shall be as provided 24in the State Employee Indemnification Act.25    (g) When a Panel member may have an actual, perceived, or 26potential conflict of interest or appearance of bias that   HB5517- 15 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1could prevent the Panel member from making a fair and 2impartial decision on a complaint or formal complaint:3        (1) The Panel member shall self-recuse.4        (2) If the Panel member fails to self-recuse, then the 5    remaining members of the Panel may, by a simple majority, 6    vote to recuse the Panel member. Any Panel member who is 7    found to have voted on a matter in which the Panel member 8    they should have self-recused may be removed from the 9    Panel by the State official who initially appointed the 10    Panel member. A conflict of interest or appearance of bias 11    may include, but is not limited to, matters where one of 12    the following is a party to a certification decision for 13    formal complaint: someone with whom the Panel member has 14    an employment relationship; any of the following 15    relatives: spouse, parents, children, adopted children, 16    legal wards, stepchildren, stepparents, step siblings, 17    half siblings, siblings, parents-in-law, siblings-in-law, 18    children-in-law, aunts, uncles, nieces, and nephews; a 19    friend; or a member of a professional organization or 20    association in which the member now actively serves.21    (h) A vacancy in membership does not impair the ability of 22a quorum to exercise all rights and perform all duties of the 23Panel.24    (i) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 25the changes made to this Section by Public Act 102-694 this 26amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly and Public Act   HB5517- 16 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1101-652 take effect July 1, 2022. 2(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-22; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 3revised 7-3-25.) 4    (50 ILCS 705/3.3 new)5    Sec. 3.3. Certification Enforcement Unit.6    (a) The Certification Enforcement Unit is hereby created 7within the Board and shall be responsible for the 8investigation of matters under Sections 6.1 and 6.3 and the 9prosecution of matters under Section 6.3. The Certification 10Enforcement Unit shall be headed by the Deputy Director of the 11Certification Enforcement Unit and shall be composed of one or 12more investigators and other staff members. The Board shall 13set the minimum qualifications, appropriate screening 14procedures, and appropriate staffing levels for all positions 15of Board employment necessary to carry out the Board's powers 16and duties.17    (b) The Deputy Director of the Certification Enforcement 18Unit shall be appointed by the Board and must have:19        (1) substantial experience in law enforcement, 20    criminal law, civil-rights law, or government 21    investigations; and22        (2) demonstrated integrity, professionalism, sound 23    judgment, and leadership.24    (c) A person may not be appointed as the Deputy Director if 25the person:  HB5517- 17 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1        (1) was a law enforcement officer and was terminated 2    for decertifying conduct under Section 6.3;3        (2) was a law enforcement officer and was decertified;4        (3) was a law enforcement officer and the person's law 5    enforcement license or certificate was revoked in this 6    State or any other jurisdiction; or7        (4) has been convicted of any of the crimes listed in 8    subsection (a) of Section 6.2a.9    The Deputy Director may have previously served as a 10certified or licensed law enforcement officer.11    (d) Any investigator hired to serve in the Certification 12Enforcement Unit must have at least 2 years of prior 13investigative experience and may have previously served as a 14certified or licensed law enforcement officer.15    (e) A person may not be hired as an investigator if the 16person:17        (1) was a law enforcement officer and was terminated 18    for decertifying conduct under Section 6.3;19        (2) was a law enforcement officer and was decertified;20        (3) was a law enforcement officer and the person's law 21    enforcement license or certificate was revoked in this 22    State or any other jurisdiction; or23        (4) has been convicted of any of the crimes listed in 24    subsection (a) of Section 6.2a.25    (f) Any complaint filed against the Board's investigators 26shall be investigated by the Illinois State Police.   HB5517- 18 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    (50 ILCS 705/6)  (from Ch. 85, par. 506)2    Sec. 6. Powers and duties of the Board; selection and 3certification of schools. The Board shall select and certify 4schools within the State of Illinois for the purpose of 5providing basic training for probationary law enforcement 6officers, probationary county corrections officers, and court 7security officers and of providing advanced or in-service 8training for permanent law enforcement officers or permanent 9county corrections officers, which schools may be either 10publicly or privately owned and operated. In addition, the 11Board has the following power and duties:12        a. To require law enforcement agencies to furnish such 13    reports and information as the Board deems necessary to 14    fully implement this Act.15        b. To establish appropriate mandatory minimum 16    standards relating to the training of probationary local 17    law enforcement officers or probationary county 18    corrections officers, and in-service training of permanent 19    law enforcement officers.20        c. (Blank). To provide appropriate certification to 21    those probationary officers who successfully complete the 22    prescribed minimum standard basic training course.23        c-5. To determine whether an applicant has met the 24    requirements of this Act or Section 3-6001.5 of the 25    Counties Code and is qualified to be certified as an   HB5517- 19 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    officer and to issue a certificate to those so qualified. 2        d. To review and approve annual training curriculum 3    for county sheriffs.4        e. To review and approve applicants to ensure that no 5    applicant is admitted to a certified academy unless the 6    applicant is a person of good character and has not been 7    convicted of, found guilty of, entered a plea of guilty 8    to, or entered a plea of nolo contendere to a felony 9    offense, any of the misdemeanors in Sections 11-1.50, 10    11-6, 11-6.5, 11-6.6, 11-9.1, 11-9.1B, 11-14, 11-14.1, 11    11-30, 12-2, 12-3.2, 12-3.4, 12-3.5, 16-1, 17-1, 17-2, 12    26.5-1, 26.5-2, 26.5-3, 28-3, 29-1, any misdemeanor in 13    violation of any Section of Part E of Title III of the 14    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or 15    subsection (a) of Section 17-32 of the Criminal Code of 16    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or Section 5 or 5.2 of 17    the Cannabis Control Act, or a crime involving moral 18    turpitude under the laws of this State or any other state 19    which if committed in this State would be punishable as a 20    felony or a crime of moral turpitude, or any felony or 21    misdemeanor in violation of federal law or the law of any 22    state that is the equivalent of any of the offenses 23    specified therein. The Board may appoint investigators who 24    shall enforce the duties conferred upon the Board by this 25    Act.26        For purposes of this paragraph e, a person is   HB5517- 20 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    considered to have been convicted of, found guilty of, or 2    entered a plea of guilty to, plea of nolo contendere to 3    regardless of whether the adjudication of guilt or 4    sentence is withheld or not entered thereon. This includes 5    sentences of supervision, conditional discharge, or first 6    offender probation, or any similar disposition provided 7    for by law. 8        f. To establish statewide standards for minimum 9    standards regarding regular mental health screenings for 10    probationary and permanent police officers, ensuring that 11    counseling sessions and screenings remain confidential. 12        g. To review and ensure all law enforcement officers 13    and law enforcement agencies remain in compliance with 14    this Act, any other Act over which the Board exercises 15    oversight, and any administrative rules adopted under this 16    Act and any Act over which the Board exercises oversight.17        h. To suspend any certificate for a definite period, 18    limit or restrict any certificate, or revoke any 19    certificate.20        i. The Board and the Panel shall have power to secure 21    by its subpoena and bring before it any person or entity in 22    this State and to take testimony either orally or by 23    deposition or both with the same fees and mileage and in 24    the same manner as prescribed by law in judicial 25    proceedings in civil cases in circuit courts of this 26    State. The Board and the Panel shall also have the power to   HB5517- 21 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    subpoena the production of documents, papers, files, 2    books, documents, and records, whether in physical or 3    electronic form, in support of the charges and for 4    defense, and in connection with a hearing or 5    investigation.6        j. The Executive Director, the administrative law 7    judge designated by the Executive Director, and each 8    member of the Board and the Panel shall have the power to 9    administer oaths to witnesses at any hearing that the 10    Board is authorized to conduct under this Act and any 11    other oaths required or authorized to be administered by 12    the Board under this Act.13        k. In case of the neglect or refusal of any person to 14    obey a subpoena issued by the Board and the Panel, any 15    circuit court, upon application of the Board and the 16    Panel, through the Illinois Attorney General, may order 17    such person to appear before the Board and the Panel give 18    testimony or produce evidence, and any failure to obey 19    such order is punishable by the court as a contempt 20    thereof. This order may be served in person, by certified 21    mail at the person's address, or by use of a trackable 22    courier service with a signature requirement by personal 23    delivery, by email, or by mail to the address of record or 24    email address of record. 25        l. The Board shall have the power to administer state 26    certification examinations. Any and all records related to   HB5517- 22 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    these examinations, including, but not limited to, test 2    questions, test formats, digital files, answer responses, 3    answer keys, and scoring information shall be exempt from 4    disclosure. 5        m. To make grants, subject to appropriation, to units 6    of local government and public institutions of higher 7    education for the purposes of hiring and retaining law 8    enforcement officers. 9        n. (Blank). To make grants, subject to appropriation, 10    to local law enforcement agencies for costs associated 11    with the expansion and support of National Integrated 12    Ballistic Information Network (NIBIN) and other ballistic 13    technology equipment for ballistic testing. 14        o. To create a Certification Enforcement Unit within 15    the Board.16        p. To review annually police pursuit procedures and 17    make available suggested law enforcement pursuit 18    guidelines for law enforcement agencies. The police 19    pursuit guidelines adopted by the Board do not alter the 20    effect of previously existing law, including the 21    immunities established under the Local Governmental and 22    Governmental Employees Tort Immunity Act. 23(Source: P.A. 102-687, eff. 12-17-21; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 24102-1115, eff. 1-9-23; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23.) 25    (50 ILCS 705/6.3)  HB5517- 23 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    Sec. 6.3. Discretionary decertification of full-time and 2part-time law enforcement officers.3    (a) Definitions. For purposes of this Section 6.3:4    "Duty to intervene" means an obligation to intervene to 5prevent harm from occurring that arises when: an officer is 6present, and has reason to know (1) that excessive force is 7being used or that any constitutional violation has been 8committed by a law enforcement official; and (2) the officer 9has a realistic opportunity to intervene. This duty applies 10equally to supervisory and nonsupervisory officers. If aid is 11required, the officer shall not, when reasonable to administer 12aid, knowingly and willingly refuse to render aid as defined 13by State or federal law. An officer does not violate this duty 14if the failure to render aid is due to circumstances such as 15lack of appropriate specialized training, lack of resources or 16equipment, or if it is unsafe or impracticable to render aid. 17    "Excessive use of force" means using force in violation of 18State or federal law.19    "False statement" means (1) any knowingly false statement 20provided on a form or report, (2) that the writer does not 21believe to be true, and (3) that the writer includes to mislead 22a public servant in performing the public servant's official 23functions; (2) knowingly concealing information from a 24statement causing a portion of the statement to be misleading, 25or creating a false impression by the statement; or (3) 26submitting or inviting reliance on a writing or recording that   HB5517- 24 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1is false, forged, altered, or otherwise lacking in 2authenticity.3    "Perjury" means the crime that as defined under Sections 432-2 and 32-3 of the Criminal Code of 2012.5    "Tampers with or fabricates evidence" means if a law 6enforcement officer (1) has reason to believe that an official 7proceeding is pending or may be instituted, and (2) alters, 8destroys, conceals, or removes any record, document, data, 9video or thing to impair its validity or availability in the 10proceeding.11    (b) Decertification conduct. The Board has the authority 12to decertify a full-time or a part-time law enforcement 13officer upon a determination by the Board that the law 14enforcement officer has:15        (1) committed an act that would constitute a felony or 16    misdemeanor which could serve as basis for automatic 17    decertification, whether or not the law enforcement 18    officer was criminally prosecuted, and whether or not the 19    law enforcement officer's employment was terminated;20        (2) exercised excessive use of force;21        (3) failed to comply with the officer's duty to 22    intervene, including through acts or omissions;23        (4) turned off or tampered with a dash camera or 24    body-worn camera or data recorded by a dash camera or 25    body-worn camera for the purpose of concealing, 26    destroying, or altering potential evidence or directed   HB5517- 25 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    another to tamper with or turn off a dash camera or 2    body-worn camera or data recorded by a dash camera or 3    body-worn camera for the purpose of concealing, destroying 4    or altering potential evidence;5        (5) engaged in the following conduct relating to the 6    reporting, investigation, or prosecution of a crime: 7    committed perjury, made a false statement, or knowingly 8    tampered with or fabricated evidence; or and9        (6) engaged in any unprofessional, unethical, 10    deceptive, or deleterious conduct or practice harmful to 11    the public; such conduct or practice need not have 12    resulted in actual injury to any person. As used in this 13    paragraph, the term "unprofessional conduct" shall include 14    any act that constitutes a significant abuse of the public 15    trust; sexual misconduct; exploiting or misusing the 16    position of the officer; or any departure from, or failure 17    to conform to, the minimal standards of acceptable and 18    prevailing practice of an officer that demonstrates an 19    officer's unfitness to serve.20    (b-5) The Board has the authority to decertify a full-time 21or part-time law enforcement officer notwithstanding whether 22other a law enforcement agency takes disciplinary action is 23taken against a law enforcement officer for the same 24underlying conduct as outlined in subsection (b).25    (c) Notice of Alleged Violation.26        (1) The following individuals and agencies shall   HB5517- 26 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    notify the Board within 7 days of becoming aware of any 2    violation described in subsection (b):3            (A) A law enforcement agency, as defined in 4        Section 2, or any law enforcement officer of this 5        State, unless the law enforcement officer or law 6        enforcement agency knows that the conduct has been 7        reported previously by another individual or agency. 8        For this subsection (c), law enforcement agency 9        includes, but is not limited to, a civilian oversight 10        entity review board, an inspector general, and legal 11        counsel for a law enforcement agency, and legal 12        counsel for a municipality that employs the law 13        enforcement officer permitted by law or other ethical 14        rules.15            (B) The Executive Director of the Board;16            (C) A State's Attorney's Office of this State.17        "Becoming aware" means that an individual has acquired 18    information that reasonably suggests a reportable event 19    has occurred. "Becoming aware" does not include 20    confidential communications between agency lawyers and 21    agencies regarding legal advice. For purposes of this 22    subsection, "law enforcement agency" does not include the 23    Illinois Attorney General when providing legal 24    representation to a law enforcement officer under the 25    State Employee Indemnification Act.26        (2) Any person may also notify the Board of any   HB5517- 27 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    conduct the person believes a law enforcement officer has 2    committed as described in subsection (b). Such 3    notifications may be made confidentially. Notwithstanding 4    any other provision in state law or any collective 5    bargaining agreement, the Board shall accept notice and 6    investigate any allegations from individuals who remain 7    confidential.8        (3) Upon written request, the Board shall disclose to 9    the individual or entity who filed a notice of alleged 10    violation the status of the Board's review.11    (d) Form. The notice of alleged violation reported under 12subsection (c) shall be on a form prescribed by the Board in 13its rules. The form shall be publicly available by paper and 14electronic means. The form shall include fields for the 15following information, at a minimum:16        (1) the full name, address, and telephone number of 17    the person submitting the notice;18        (2) if submitted under subsection (c)(1), the agency 19    name and title of the person submitting the notice;20        (3) the full name, badge number, law enforcement 21    employing agency, and physical description of the officer, 22    if known;23        (4) the full name or names, address or addresses, 24    telephone number or numbers, and physical description or 25    descriptions of any witnesses, if known;26        (5) a concise statement of facts that describe the   HB5517- 28 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    alleged violation and any copies of supporting evidence, 2    including, but not limited to, any photographic, video, or 3    audio recordings of the incident;4        (6) whether the person submitting the notice has 5    notified any other agency; and6        (7) an option for an individual, who submits directly 7    to the Board, to consent to have the individual's identity 8    disclosed. The identity of any individual providing 9    information or reporting any possible or alleged violation 10    to the Board shall be kept confidential and may not be 11    disclosed without the consent of that individual, unless 12    the individual consents to disclosure of the individual's 13    name or disclosure of the individual's identity is 14    otherwise required by law. The confidentiality granted by 15    this subsection does not preclude the disclosure of the 16    identity of a person in any capacity other than as the 17    source of an allegation. 18    Nothing in this subsection (d) shall preclude the Board 19from receiving, investigating, or acting upon allegations made 20confidentially, or in a format different from the form 21provided for in this subsection, or as otherwise provided for 22by law.23    (e) Preliminary review.24        (1) The Certification Enforcement Unit Board shall 25    complete a preliminary review of the allegations to 26    determine whether there is sufficient information to   HB5517- 29 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    warrant a further investigation of any violations of the 2    Act. Upon initiating a preliminary review of the 3    allegations, the Certification Enforcement Unit Board 4    shall notify the head of the law enforcement agency 5    associated with that employs the law enforcement officer 6    who is the subject of the allegations. At the request of 7    the Certification Enforcement Unit Board, a the law 8    enforcement agency must submit any copies of investigative 9    findings, evidence, or documentation related to the 10    allegations to the Certification Enforcement Unit Board in 11    accordance with rules adopted by the Certification 12    Enforcement Unit Board to facilitate the Certification 13    Enforcement Unit's Board's preliminary review. The 14    Certification Enforcement Unit Board may correspond with 15    the law enforcement agency, official records clerks or any 16    investigative agencies in conducting its preliminary 17    review.18        (2) During the preliminary review, the Certification 19    Enforcement Unit Board will take all reasonable steps to 20    discover any and all objective verifiable evidence 21    relevant to the alleged violation through the 22    identification, retention, review, and analysis of all 23    currently available evidence, including, but not limited 24    to: all time-sensitive evidence, audio and video evidence, 25    physical evidence, arrest reports, photographic evidence, 26    GPS records, computer data, lab reports, medical   HB5517- 30 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    documents, and witness interviews. All reasonable steps 2    will be taken to preserve relevant evidence identified 3    during the preliminary investigation.4        (3) If after a preliminary review of the alleged 5    violation or violations, the Certification Enforcement 6    Unit Board believes there is sufficient information to 7    warrant further investigation of any violations of this 8    Act, the alleged violation or violations shall be assigned 9    for investigation in accordance with subsection (f).10        (4) If after a review of the allegations, the 11    Certification Enforcement Unit Board believes there is not 12    sufficient insufficient information supporting the 13    allegations to warrant further investigation, it may close 14    a notice. Notification of the Certification Enforcement 15    Unit's Board's decision to close a notice of alleged 16    violation shall be sent to all relevant individuals, 17    agencies, and any entities that received the notice of 18    alleged the violation under subsection (c) within 30 days 19    of the notice of alleged violation being closed, except in 20    cases where the notice of alleged violation is submitted 21    anonymously if the complainant is unknown.22        (5) Except when the Board has received notice under 23    subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subsection (c), no 24    later than 30 days after receiving notice, the 25    Certification Enforcement Unit Board shall report any 26    notice of alleged violation it receives to the relevant   HB5517- 31 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    law enforcement agency, unless reporting the notice would 2    jeopardize any subsequent investigation. The Certification 3    Enforcement Unit Board shall also record any notice of 4    alleged violation it receives to the Officer Professional 5    Conduct Database in accordance with Section 9.2. The Board 6    shall report to the appropriate State's Attorney any 7    alleged violations that contain allegations, claims, or 8    factual assertions that, if true, would constitute a 9    violation of Illinois law. The Certification Enforcement 10    Unit Board shall inform the law enforcement officer via 11    personal service, certified mail at their address of 12    record or by use of a trackable courier service with 13    signature requirement certified mail that it has received 14    a notice of alleged violation against the law enforcement 15    officer.16        If the Certification Enforcement Unit Board determines 17    that due to the circumstances and the nature of the 18    allegation that it would not be prudent to notify the law 19    enforcement officer and the officer's law enforcement 20    agency unless and until the filing of charges a Formal 21    Complaint, the Certification Enforcement Unit Board shall 22    document in the file the reason or reasons a notification 23    was not made.24        (6) If the law enforcement officer is involved in a 25    criminal proceeding on the same subject as the notice of 26    violation, the Board is responsible for maintaining a   HB5517- 32 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    current status report including court dates, hearings, 2    pleas, adjudication status and sentencing. A State's 3    Attorney's Office must notify the Board of any criminal 4    charges filed against a law enforcement officer within 30 5    days of such filing , and must provide updates of 6    significant developments to the Board in a timely manner 7    but no later than 30 days after such developments. When a 8    law enforcement officer is charged in a criminal 9    proceeding related to conduct that is the subject of a 10    notice of alleged violation, the Board is responsible for 11    maintaining a current status report regarding the criminal 12    proceedings, including court dates, hearings, pleas, 13    adjudication status, and sentencing. 14    (f) Investigations; requirements. After the Certification 15Enforcement Unit concludes its Investigations are to be 16assigned after a preliminary review, the Certification 17Enforcement Unit shall assign the investigation of the 18allegations in the notice of alleged violation as provided in 19paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection (f), unless 20the investigations were closed under paragraph (4) of 21subsection (e), as follows in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of 22this subsection (f).23        (1) A law enforcement agency that submits a notice of 24    alleged violation to the Board under subparagraph (A) of 25    paragraph (1) of subsection (c) shall be responsible for 26    conducting an investigation of the underlying allegations   HB5517- 33 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    except when: (i) the law enforcement agency refers the 2    notice to another law enforcement agency or the Board for 3    investigation and such other agency or the Certification 4    Enforcement Unit Board agrees to conduct the 5    investigation; (ii) an external, independent, or civilian 6    oversight agency conducts the investigation in accordance 7    with local ordinance or other applicable law; or (iii) the 8    Certification Enforcement Unit Board has determined that 9    it will conduct the investigation based upon the facts and 10    circumstances of the alleged violation, including, but not 11    limited to, investigations regarding the Chief or Sheriff 12    of a law enforcement agency, familial conflict of 13    interests, complaints involving a substantial portion of a 14    law enforcement agency, or complaints involving a policy 15    of a law enforcement agency. Any agency or entity 16    conducting an investigation under this paragraph (1) shall 17    submit quarterly reports to the Certification Enforcement 18    Unit Board regarding the progress of the investigation. 19    The quarterly report shall be reviewed by the individual 20    or individuals at the Certification Enforcement Unit Board 21    who conducted the preliminary review, if available. If an 22    investigation proceeds more than 6 months beyond the 23    initial investigation assignment, the Certification 24    Enforcement Unit shall request that the investigating 25    agency show cause in writing as to why the investigation 26    has proceeded for this extended period and provide an   HB5517- 34 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    estimated timeline for completion of their investigation. 2    Any agency or entity conducting an investigation under 3    this paragraph (1) shall, within 7 days of completing an 4    investigation, deliver, to the Deputy Director of the 5    Certification Enforcement Unit, an Investigative Summary 6    Report and copies of any evidentiary material, including, 7    but not limited to, documents or video, that is relevant 8    to assessing the notice of the alleged violation 9    administrative evidence to the Board. If the Deputy 10    Director of the Certification Enforcement Unit Board finds 11    an investigation conducted under this paragraph (1) is 12    incomplete, unsatisfactory, or deficient in any way, the 13    Deputy Director of the Certification Enforcement Unit 14    Board may direct the investigating entity or agency to 15    take any additional investigative steps deemed necessary 16    to thoroughly and satisfactorily complete the 17    investigation, or the Certification Enforcement Unit Board 18    may take any steps necessary to complete the 19    investigation. The investigating entity or agency or, when 20    necessary, the Certification Enforcement Unit Board will 21    then amend and re-submit the Investigative Summary Report 22    to the Certification Enforcement Unit Board for approval.23        The Certification Enforcement Unit Board shall submit 24    a report to the investigating entity disclosing the name, 25    address, and telephone numbers of persons who have 26    knowledge of facts which are the subject of the   HB5517- 35 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    investigation and identifying the subject matter of their 2    knowledge. 3        (2) The Certification Enforcement Unit Board shall 4    investigate and complete an Investigative Summary Report 5    when a State's Attorney's Office submits a notice of 6    alleged violation to the Board under subparagraph (C) of 7    paragraph (1) of subsection (c) (c)(1)(C).8        (3) When a person submits a notice to the Board under 9    paragraph (2) of subsection (c), the Certification 10    Enforcement Unit The Board shall assign the investigation 11    to the law enforcement agency associated with that employs 12    the law enforcement officer, except when: (i) the law 13    enforcement agency requests to refer the notice to another 14    law enforcement agency or the Board for investigation and 15    such other agency or the Board agrees to conduct the 16    investigation; (ii) an external, independent, or civilian 17    oversight agency conducts the investigation in accordance 18    with local ordinance or other applicable law; or (iii) the 19    Certification Enforcement Unit Board has determined that 20    either (I) it will conduct the investigation based upon 21    the facts and circumstances of the alleged violation, 22    including, but not limited to, investigations regarding 23    the Chief or Sheriff of a law enforcement agency, familial 24    conflict of interests, complaints involving a substantial 25    portion of a law enforcement agency, or complaints 26    involving a policy of a law enforcement agency or (II) it   HB5517- 36 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    is, based on the facts and circumstances, in the public 2    interest for the Certification Enforcement Unit to do so. 3    The public interest shall include conflicts of interest, a 4    perceived lack of impartiality, or the severity of the 5    alleged wrongdoing that significantly impacts public trust 6    if not handled by a neutral party. 7        The investigating entity or agency shall submit 8    quarterly reports to the Board regarding the progress of 9    the investigation in a form to be determined by the Board. 10    The quarterly report shall be reviewed by the individual 11    at the Certification Enforcement Unit Board who conducted 12    the preliminary review, if available. If an investigation 13    proceeds more than 6 months beyond the initial 14    investigation assignment, then the Certification 15    Enforcement Unit shall request that the investigating 16    agency show cause in writing as to why the investigation 17    has proceeded for the extended period and provide an 18    estimated timeline for completion of the agency's 19    investigation. 20    The investigating entity or agency shall, within 7 days of 21    completing an investigation, deliver an Investigative 22    Summary Report and copies of any evidence to the Deputy 23    Director of the Certification Enforcement Unit Board. If 24    the Deputy Director of the Certification Enforcement Unit 25    Board finds an investigation conducted under this 26    subsection (f)(3) is incomplete, unsatisfactory, biased,   HB5517- 37 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    or deficient in any way, the Deputy Director of the 2    Certification Enforcement Unit Board may direct the 3    investigating entity to take any additional investigative 4    steps deemed necessary to thoroughly and satisfactorily 5    complete the investigation, or the Certification 6    Enforcement Unit Board may take any steps necessary to 7    complete the investigation. The investigating entity or 8    agency or, when necessary, the Certification Enforcement 9    Unit Board will then amend and re-submit the Investigative 10    Summary Report to the Deputy Director of the Certification 11    Enforcement Unit Board for approval. The investigating 12    entity shall cooperate with and assist the Certification 13    Enforcement Unit Board, as necessary, in any subsequent 14    investigation.15        (4) Concurrent Investigations. The Certification 16    Enforcement Unit Board may, at any point, initiate an 17    investigation under this Section to be conducted 18    concurrently with any administrative investigation of the 19    alleged misconduct conducted by the law enforcement agency 20    that employs the law enforcement officer or other 21    investigative entity. The employing agency or other 22    investigative a concurrent investigation under this 23    section. The original investigating entity shall timely 24    communicate, coordinate, and cooperate with the 25    Certification Enforcement Unit Board to the fullest 26    extent. The Board shall promulgate rules that shall   HB5517- 38 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    address, at a minimum, the sharing of information and 2    investigative means such as subpoenas and interviewing 3    witnesses.4        (5) Investigative Summary Report. An Investigative 5    Summary Report shall contain, at a minimum, the 6    allegations and elements of within each alleged offense 7    allegation followed by a description of the testimonial, 8    documentary, and or physical evidence that is relevant to 9    each such allegation or element listed and discussed in 10    association with it. The Investigative Summary Report 11    shall also include a discussion of whether the 12    investigation uncovered facts sufficient to prove or 13    disprove the allegations. All persons who have been 14    interviewed and listed in the Investigative Summary Report 15    will be identified as a complainant, witness, person with 16    specialized knowledge, or law enforcement employee.17        (6) Each law enforcement agency shall adopt a written 18    policy regarding the investigation of conduct under 19    subsection (a) that involves a law enforcement officer 20    associated with employed by that law enforcement agency. 21    The written policy adopted must include the following, at 22    a minimum:23            (a) Each law enforcement officer shall immediately 24        report any conduct under subsection (b) to the 25        appropriate supervising officer.26            (b) The written policy under this Section shall be   HB5517- 39 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1        available for inspection and copying under the Freedom 2        of Information Act, and not subject to any exemption 3        of that Act.4        (7) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit a law 5    enforcement agency from conducting an investigation for 6    the purpose of internal discipline. However, any such 7    investigation shall be conducted in a manner that avoids 8    interference with, and preserves the integrity of, any 9    separate investigation by the Certification Enforcement 10    Unit Board being conducted.11        (8) A law enforcement agency or the Certification 12    Enforcement Unit performing an investigation under this 13    Section shall preserve all evidence. This information 14    shall be contained in a single investigation file. Upon 15    the filing of a formal complaint seeking decertification, 16    the investigation file shall be subject to unredacted 17    disclosure to the law enforcement officer subject to the 18    investigation. 19    (g) Formal complaints. Upon receipt of an Investigative 20Summary Report, the Certification Enforcement Unit Board shall 21review the report Report and any relevant evidence obtained 22and determine whether there is reasonable basis to believe 23that the law enforcement officer committed any conduct that 24would be deemed a violation of this Act. If after reviewing the 25report Report and any other relevant evidence obtained, the 26Certification Enforcement Unit Board determines that a   HB5517- 40 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1reasonable basis does exist, the Certification Enforcement 2Unit Board shall file a formal complaint with the 3Decertification Certification Review Panel.4    (h) Formal Complaint Hearing.5        (1) Within 7 days after receipt Upon issuance of a 6    formal complaint by the Certification Enforcement Unit, 7    the Panel shall set the matter for an initial hearing in 8    front of an administrative law judge. At least 30 days 9    before the date set for an initial hearing, the 10    Certification Enforcement Unit Panel must, in writing, 11    notify the accused law enforcement officer that a formal 12    complaint has been issued by the Board. Notice of the 13    formal complaint may be served in person, by certified 14    mail at the law enforcement officer's address of record, 15    or by use of a trackable courier service with signature 16    requirement. Notice of the formal complaint shall also be 17    provided to the law enforcement officer's employing law 18    enforcement agency. Notice of the formal complaint shall 19    include subject to the complaint of the following:20            (i) the allegations against the law enforcement 21        officer, the time and place for the hearing, and 22        whether the law enforcement officer's certification 23        has been temporarily suspended under Section 8.3;24            (ii) a statement that the officer has the right to 25        file a written answer to the complaint with the Panel 26        within 30 days after service of the notice;  HB5517- 41 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1            (iii) a statement that if the law enforcement 2        officer fails to file a written answer within 30 days 3        after service of the notice or fails to attend the 4        hearing comply with the notice of the default order in 5        paragraph (2), the administrative law judge Panel 6        shall enter a default order against the law 7        enforcement officer along with a finding that the 8        allegations in the complaint are deemed admitted, and 9        that the law enforcement officer's certification may 10        be revoked as a result; and11            (iv) a statement that the law enforcement officer 12        may request an informal conference to surrender the 13        officer's certification.14        (2) After showing completed service of the notice of 15    formal complaint to the law enforcement officer and the 16    law enforcement officer's failure to comply, the 17    Certification Enforcement Unit The Board shall send the 18    law enforcement officer notice of a the default order. The 19    notice shall state that the officer has 30 days to notify 20    the Board in writing of their desire to have the order 21    vacated and to appear before the Board at a 22    decertification hearing. If the law enforcement officer 23    does not notify the Board within 30 days, the Board may 24    require the Certification Enforcement Unit to set the 25    matter for hearing. If the matter is set for hearing, the 26    Certification Enforcement Unit Board shall send the law   HB5517- 42 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    enforcement officer the notice of the date, time and 2    location of the hearing. The law enforcement officer shall 3    be served by personal delivery, by certified mail at their 4    address of record, or by a trackable courier service with 5    signature requirement. If the law enforcement officer or 6    counsel for the officer does appear, at the Certification 7    Enforcement Unit's Board's discretion, the hearing may 8    proceed or may be continued to a date and time agreed upon 9    by all parties. If on the date of the hearing, neither the 10    law enforcement officer nor counsel for the officer 11    appears, the Board may proceed with the hearing for 12    default in their absence. 13        (3) If, on the date of the decertification hearing, 14    neither the law enforcement officer nor counsel for the 15    officer appears or the Certification Enforcement Unit 16    declines to set the matter for hearing as required under 17    the law enforcement officer fails to comply with paragraph 18    (2), all of the allegations contained in the complaint 19    shall be deemed admitted and the law enforcement officer 20    shall be decertified if, by a majority vote of the Panel 21    panel, the conduct charged in the complaint is found to 22    constitute sufficient grounds for decertification under 23    this Act. Notice of the decertification decision may be 24    served by personal delivery, by certified mail at their 25    address of record, or by a trackable courier service with 26    signature requirement by mail, or, at the discretion of   HB5517- 43 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    the Board, by electronic means as adopted by rule to the 2    address or email address specified by the law enforcement 3    officer in the officer's last communication with the 4    Board. Notice shall also be provided to the law 5    enforcement officer's employing law enforcement agency. 6    The law enforcement officer's law enforcement agency shall 7    make all reasonable efforts to provide a copy of the 8    notice to the law enforcement officer within 7 days after 9    receiving the notice. 10        (4) The Board, at the request of the law enforcement 11    officer subject to the Formal Complaint, may suspend a 12    hearing on a Formal Complaint for no more than one year if 13    a concurrent criminal matter is pending. If the law 14    enforcement officer requests to have the hearing 15    suspended, the law enforcement officer's certification 16    shall be deemed inactive until the Board makes a final 17    decision on the matter law enforcement officer's Formal 18    Complaint hearing concludes. The Board or the law 19    enforcement officer may request to have the hearing 20    suspended for up to 6 additional months for good cause. 21    This request may be renewed. For purposes of this 22    paragraph (4), "good cause" means an incident or 23    occurrence that is beyond the control of the requester and 24    that prevents the hearing from occurring, or holding the 25    hearing would impose an undue hardship or prejudice on the 26    requester.   HB5517- 44 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1        (5) Surrender of certification or waiver. At any time 2    Upon the Board's issuance of a complaint, and prior to 3    hearing on the matter, a law enforcement officer may 4    choose to surrender the officer's certification or waiver 5    by notifying the Board in writing of the officer's 6    decision to do so. Upon receipt of such notification from 7    the law enforcement officer, the Board shall immediately 8    decertify the officer, or revoke any waiver previously 9    granted. In the case of a surrender of certification, if 10    the officer has pending decertification investigation or 11    hearing, there will be no further proceedings related to 12    the Board's formal complaint, and the matter will be 13    closed and terminated or waiver, the Board's proceeding 14    shall terminate.15        (5.5) Mandatory prehearing disclosures. No later than 16    28 days before the hearing, the law enforcement officer, 17    the law enforcement officer's counsel, or the law 18    enforcement officer and the law enforcement officer's 19    counsel shall disclose the following:20            (i) if known, the name, address, and telephone 21        number of each individual likely to have information 22        relevant to the hearing that the law enforcement 23        officer may use to support the law enforcement 24        officer's defenses; and25            (ii) a copy of any documents and videos that are in 26        the possession, custody, or control of the law   HB5517- 45 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1        enforcement officer and that the law enforcement 2        officer may use to support the law enforcement 3        officer's defenses. 4        No later than 28 days after the filing of a formal 5    complaint, the Certification Enforcement Unit shall give 6    to the law enforcement officer or the law enforcement 7    officer's counsel a copy of the complete and unredacted 8    investigation file as required under paragraph (8), 9    including all demonstrative exhibits, evidence, and other 10    information that may be used during the hearing, 11    including, but not limited to, any name and last known 12    address that has previously been held as confidential by 13    the Certification Enforcement Unit or the Board. 14        (6) Appointment of administrative law judges. The 15    Board shall retain at least 3 attorneys any attorney 16    licensed to practice law in the State of Illinois to serve 17    as an administrative law judge in any action involving a 18    law enforcement officer under this Act. Any attorney 19    retained to serve as an The administrative law judge shall 20    serve be retained to a term of no greater than 4 years. If 21    more than one administrative law judge is retained, the 22    terms shall be staggered. Any The administrative law judge 23    shall have has full authority to conduct the hearings.24        Any attorney retained to serve as an administrative 25    law judge must have at least 8 years of experience 26    practicing law in Illinois, and at least 5 years of   HB5517- 46 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    litigation experience.2        Prior to the commencement of a hearing, each party has 3    the right to demand a new administrative law judge without 4    having to show cause, and a new administrative judge shall 5    be assigned.6        After the hearing has begun, any party may file with 7    the Board a request for the removal of an administrative 8    law judge for cause, along with a supporting affidavit, on 9    the grounds that the administrative law judge cannot 10    render a fair and impartial decision in a particular case. 11    The Panel shall assign the matter for a determination to 12    an administrative law judge not challenged in the motion. 13    If the administrative law judge finds that the party's 14    reasons for objecting do not warrant disqualification, 15    then the administrative law judge shall set forth in 16    writing the reasons disqualification is not warranted, 17    send the writing to the parties, and reiterate that 18    decision at the hearing. 19        The Board shall provide or make arrangements to 20    provide each administrative law judge with Administrative 21    law judges will receive initial and annual training that 22    is adequate in quality, quantity, scope, and type, and 23    will cover, at minimum the following topics:24            (i) constitutional and other relevant law on 25        police-community encounters, including the law on the 26        use of force and stops, searches, and arrests;  HB5517- 47 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1            (ii) police tactics;2            (iii) investigations of police conduct;3            (iv) impartial policing;4            (v) policing individuals in crisis;5            (vi) Illinois police policies, procedures, and 6        disciplinary rules;7            (vii) procedural justice; and8            (viii) community outreach.9        The Board shall determine the content and extent of 10    the training within the scope provided for by this 11    subsection. 12        (6.5) Ineligible administrative law judges. An 13    attorney is ineligible to serve as an administrative law 14    judge if the attorney:15            (i) was employed or retained to serve as counsel 16        or expert witness by any law enforcement agency in the 17        preceding 5 years;18            (ii) was employed or retained to serve as counsel 19        or expert witness by a law enforcement collective 20        bargaining entity in the preceding 5 years;21            (iii) was employed or retained by a group involved 22        in litigation against law enforcement in the preceding 23        5 years; or24            (iv) is currently employed by the Board. 25        No administrative law judge may preside over a hearing 26    if the administrative law judge is prejudiced or partial   HB5517- 48 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    with respect to any party or has any interest in the matter 2    pending for decision.3        An adverse ruling made by an administrative law judge 4    shall not constitute bias or conflict of interest. An 5    adverse ruling or rulings rendered against the party or 6    its representative in any previous matter shall not 7    constitute sufficient grounds for disqualification under 8    this Section. An adverse ruling made by an administrative 9    law judge may be used as evidence of bias or conflict of 10    interest. 11        (7) Hearing procedures. At the hearing, the 12    administrative law judge will hear evidence related to the 13    allegations outlined alleged in the formal complaint. The 14    law enforcement officer, the counsel of the officer's 15    choosing, and the Board, or the officer's counsel, shall 16    be afforded the opportunity to present any pertinent 17    statements, testimony, evidence, and arguments. The law 18    enforcement officer may shall be afforded the opportunity 19    to request that the administrative law judge Board compel 20    the attendance of witnesses and production of related 21    documents.22        At the hearing, the Certification Enforcement Unit 23    bears the burden of proving that the officer committed the 24    decertifying conduct, as defined in subsection (b), by 25    clear and convincing evidence. The Illinois Rules of 26    Evidence shall apply to the extent practicable unless, by   HB5517- 49 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    the application, the administrative law judge determines 2    that application of the rule would be an injustice or 3    preclude the introduction of evidence of the type commonly 4    relied upon by a reasonably prudent person in the conduct 5    of the administrative judge's affairs. The administrative 6    law judge must state on the record the administrative law 7    judge's reasons for that determination. Any objection with 8    respect to the conduct of the hearing, including any 9    objection to the introduction of evidence, may be stated 10    orally, accompanied by a short statement of the grounds 11    for the objection, and included in the record. No 12    objection shall be deemed waived by further participation 13    in the hearing. Testimony shall be taken only on oath or 14    affirmation. Subject to the evidentiary requirements of 15    this Section, a party may conduct cross-examination 16    required for a full and fair disclosure of the facts. The 17    Certification Enforcement Unit may introduce evidence of 18    repeated prior conduct in aggravation. 19        All hearings shall be open to the public. However, a 20    portion of the hearing may be closed to the public only if 21    the party seeking closure can prove with specificity that 22    the portion of the hearing will reveal confidential 23    information that creates a compelling interest outweighing 24    the public's interest. The administrative law judge may, 25    in a nonpublic session, hear and consider the request for 26    closure and rule on such request.   HB5517- 50 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1        All proceedings before the administrative law judge 2    shall be recorded and retained in the file for the 3    proceedings. No other party, witness, or member of the 4    viewing public may make an audio or video record of the 5    proceedings. One copy of the transcript shall be made 6    available to the relevant law enforcement officer or the 7    law enforcement agency that employs the law enforcement 8    officer at no cost. 9        (8) Hearing summary report. After the conclusion of 10    the hearing, the administrative law judge shall issue a 11    hearing summary report that summarizes the administrative 12    law judge's report any findings of fact, conclusions of 13    law, and recommended disposition of the matter to the 14    Panel. The administrative law judge shall also provide a 15    copy of the report to If the law enforcement officer and 16    the agency that employs the law enforcement officer. Any 17    party to the proceeding may object to any findings of 18    fact, conclusions of law, or the recommended disposition 19    outlined in the hearing summary report, in writing by 20    filing a objects to any procedural or substantive legal 21    portion of the report, the officer may do so by written 22    brief filed with the Panel within 28 14 days of after 23    receipt of the hearing summary report. At the request of 24    the parties, the report. The Panel may grant reasonable 25    extensions for the submission of objections to the hearing 26    summary report for good cause shown or when mutually   HB5517- 51 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    agreed upon by the parties. 2        No later than 28 days before the hearing, a party 3    shall disclose the following:4            (i) The name and, if known, the address and 5        telephone number of each individual likely to have 6        information relevant to the hearing that the 7        disclosing party may use to support its claims or 8        defenses. This includes, but is not limited to, any 9        name that has previously been held as confidential by 10        the Board.11            (ii) A copy of any documents and videos that are in 12        the possession, custody, or control of the party, and 13        that the disclosing party may use to support its 14        claims or defenses. 15    (h-5) (8) Certification Review Meeting. Upon receipt of 16the administrative law judge's hearing summary report findings 17of fact, conclusions of law, and recommended disposition, and 18any submitted objections to from the hearing summary report 19law enforcement officer, the Panel shall schedule call for a 20certification review meeting.21        In such a meeting, the Panel may adjourn into a closed 22    conference for the purposes of deliberating on the 23    evidence presented during the hearing. In closed 24    conference, the Panel shall consider the hearing officer's 25    findings of fact, conclusions of law, and recommended 26    disposition and may deliberate on all evidence and   HB5517- 52 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    testimony received and may consider the weight and 2    credibility to be given to the evidence received. No new 3    or additional evidence may be presented to the Panel. 4    After concluding its deliberations, the Panel shall 5    convene in open session for its consideration of the 6    matter. Public attendance at the Panel's open session 7    shall be permitted. If a simple majority of the Panel 8    finds that no allegations in the complaint supporting one 9    or more charges of misconduct are proven by clear and 10    convincing evidence, then the Panel shall recommend to the 11    Board that the complaint be dismissed. If a simple 12    majority of the Panel finds that the allegations in the 13    complaint supporting one or more charges of misconduct are 14    proven by clear and convincing evidence, then the Panel 15    shall recommend to the Board to decertify the officer. The 16    Panel shall prepare a summary report as soon as 17    practicable after the completion of the meeting including 18    the following: the hearing officer's findings of fact, 19    conclusions of law, recommended disposition, and the 20    Panel's order.21    The Panel shall vote to decertify the officer if a simple 22majority of the Panel finds that:23        (1) any alleged decertification conduct has been 24    proven by clear and convincing evidence; and25        (2) there is no mitigating factor or combination of 26    mitigating factors that significantly outweigh the   HB5517- 53 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    seriousness of the misconduct and the impact of the 2    misconduct on the victim and the community. 3    The Panel shall prepare a disposition order as soon as 4practicable after the completion of the certification review 5meeting, which shall summarize the Panel's findings of fact, 6conclusions of law, and disposition. The recommendation shall 7be delivered to the Board within 7 days and shall also be 8served upon the law enforcement officer and the law 9enforcement agency employing the law enforcement officer. 10    (h-10) (9) Final action by the Board. After receiving the 11Panel's disposition order recommendations and any objections 12by the law enforcement officer, and after due consideration of 13the Panel's recommendations, the Board, by majority vote, 14shall issue a final order regarding the final decision to 15decertify the law enforcement officer or to take no action in 16regard to the law enforcement officer. No new or additional 17evidence may be presented to the Board. If the Panel 18recommends that the Board decertify the officer, then the 19Board shall decertify the officer unless a motion to 20reconsider has been filed makes a final decision contrary to 21the recommendations of the Panel, the Board shall set forth in 22its final written decision the specific written reasons for 23not following the Panel's recommendations. A copy of the 24Board's final decision shall be served upon the law 25enforcement officer by the Board, either personally or as 26provided in this Act for the service of a notice of hearing. A   HB5517- 54 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1copy of the Board's final decision also shall be delivered to 2the last employing law enforcement agency, the complainant, 3and the Panel.4    (h-15) (10) Reconsideration of the Panel's Board's 5Decision. Within 30 days after service of the Board's final 6decision, the Panel or the law enforcement officer may file a 7written motion for reconsideration with the Board Review 8Committee. The motion for reconsideration shall specify the 9particular grounds for reconsideration. Within 10 days after 10receipt of the motion for reconsideration, the The non-moving 11party may respond to the motion for reconsideration. The Board 12Review Committee shall only address the issues raised by the 13parties. The Board may not address new evidence or other 14arguments not previously presented. 15    The Board Review Committee may deny the motion for 16reconsideration, or it may grant the motion in whole or in part 17and issue an amended final order a new final decision in the 18matter. The Board Review Committee must notify the law 19enforcement officer and their last employing law enforcement 20agency within 14 days of a denial of the motion for 21reconsideration and state the reasons for denial. The law 22enforcement officer shall be served by personal delivery, by 23certified mail at their address of record, or by a trackable 24courier service with signature requirement. Denial of a motion 25for reconsideration may be appealed under Section 6.6. 26     (i) This Section applies to conduct by a full-time or   HB5517- 55 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1part-time law enforcement officer in violation of subsection 2(b) that occurred before, on, or after January 1, 2022 the 3effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 4Assembly.5    The following may be used to discretionarily decertify a 6law enforcement officer for conduct that occurred prior to 7July 1, 2022: (i) committing an act that would constitute a 8felony or misdemeanor that could serve as the basis for 9automatic decertification under subsection (a) of Section 6.2; 10(ii) using excessive force; (iii) tampering with a dash camera 11or body-worn camera or directing another person to tamper with 12a dash or body-worn camera for the purpose of concealing, 13destroying, or altering potential evidence, if the conduct 14occurred when it was unlawful to do so; (iv) committing 15perjury, intentionally making a false statement, or knowingly 16tampering with or fabricating evidence; (v) the commission or 17attempted initiation of a sexual act with a member of the 18public by means of force, threat, coercion, extortion, offer 19of leniency or other official favor, or under the color of 20authority; or (vi) intimidating witnesses, knowingly obtaining 21a false confession, or knowingly making a false arrest if 22these actions were intended to disrupt a legitimate criminal 23investigation. 24    (i-5) Information received and records kept by the Board 25for purposes of performing official duties under this Section 26are confidential and exempt from disclosure under the Freedom   HB5517- 56 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1of Information Act, except as otherwise provided in this Act.2    (i-10) Annual report. The Board shall submit an annual 3report to the Governor, Attorney General, President and 4Minority Leader of the Senate, and the Speaker and Minority 5Leader of the House of Representatives on or before March 1, 62026, and every year thereafter indicating:7        (1) the number of notices of alleged violation under 8    this Section received in the preceding calendar year;9        (2) the type of complaints received and, if known, the 10    gender and race of the complainants and officers;11        (3) the number of investigations initiated in the 12    preceding calendar year since the date of the last report;13        (4) the number of investigations concluded in the 14    preceding calendar year;15        (5) the number of investigations pending on the last 16    day of the preceding calendar year;17        (6) the number of formal complaints filed in the 18    preceding calendar year;19        (7) the number of hearings held in the preceding 20    calendar year;21        (8) the number of officers decertified in the 22    preceding calendar year;23        (9) the number of officers where insufficient cause 24    for decertification was found by an investigator 25    conducting an investigation pursuant to this Section; and26        (10) the number of officers where insufficient cause   HB5517- 57 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    for decertification was found by an administrative law 2    judge, a decertification review panel, or the Board.3    The annual report shall be made publicly available on the 4Board website.5    (j) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 6the changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of the 7102nd General Assembly and Public Act 101-652 take effect July 81, 2022. 9    (k) An individual who is decertified by the Board shall 10not function as a law enforcement officer, be assigned the 11duties of a law enforcement officer, or be authorized to carry 12firearms under the authority of a law enforcement officer, 13except as otherwise authorized to carry a firearm under State 14law or federal law. 15(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-22; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22.) 16    (50 ILCS 705/6.6)17    Sec. 6.6. Administrative Review Law; application.18    (a) (Blank). All final administrative decisions regarding 19discretionary decertification of the Board are subject to 20judicial review under the Administrative Review Law and its 21rules. The term "administrative decision" is defined in 22Section 3-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure.23    (a-5) The Board's final order or amended final order is 24subject to the judicial review provisions of the Illinois 25Administrative Procedure Act.   HB5517- 58 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    (b) Proceedings for judicial review shall be commenced in 2Sangamon County or Cook County.3    (c) To facilitate judicial review as necessary, the Board 4shall maintain all records related to any investigations and 5proceedings conducted under this Act in a permanent file in 6accordance with the retention schedule provided in the State 7Records Act. The Board is responsible for preparing and filing 8the record upon notice of the filing of a complaint for 9administrative review. 10(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-22.) 11    (50 ILCS 705/7.1)12    Sec. 7.1. Firearms restraining order training.13    (a) The Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board 14shall develop and approve a standard curriculum for a training 15program on the Firearms Restraining Order Act. The Board shall 16conduct a training program that trains officers on the use of 17firearms restraining orders, how to identify situations in 18which a firearms restraining order is appropriate, and how to 19safely promote the usage of the firearms restraining order in 20different situations. Officers who have successfully completed 21this program shall be issued a certificate attesting to their 22attendance.23    (b) Every law enforcement officer shall complete this 24training once each year.25    (c) If a law enforcement agency lacks internal expertise   HB5517- 59 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1or capacity to provide this training adequate training is 2unavailable, then the Illinois Law Enforcement Training 3Standards Board may approve training to be conducted by a 4third party.5(Source: P.A. 102-345, eff. 6-1-22.) 6    (50 ILCS 705/8)  (from Ch. 85, par. 508)7    Sec. 8. Participation required. All home rule local 8governmental units shall comply with Sections 6.3, 8.1, and 98.2 and any other mandatory provisions of this Act. This Act is 10a limitation on home rule powers under subsection (i) of 11Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 12(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-22.) 13    (50 ILCS 705/8.1)  (from Ch. 85, par. 508.1)14    Sec. 8.1. Full-time law enforcement and county corrections 15officers. 16    (a) No person shall receive a permanent appointment as a 17law enforcement officer or a permanent appointment as a county 18corrections officer unless that person has been awarded, 19within 6 months of the officer's initial full-time employment, 20a certificate attesting to the officer's successful completion 21of the Minimum Standards Basic Law Enforcement or County 22Correctional Training Course as prescribed by the Board; or 23has been awarded a certificate attesting to the officer's 24satisfactory completion of a training program of similar   HB5517- 60 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1content and number of hours and which course has been found 2acceptable by the Board under the provisions of this Act; or a 3training waiver by reason of prior law enforcement or county 4corrections experience, obtained in Illinois, in any other 5state, or with an agency of the federal government, the basic 6training requirement is determined by the Board to be 7illogical and unreasonable. Agencies seeking a reciprocity 8waiver for training completed outside of Illinois must conduct 9a thorough background check and provide verification of the 10officer's prior training. After review and satisfaction of all 11requested conditions, the officer shall be awarded an 12equivalency certificate satisfying the requirements of this 13Section. Within 60 days after the effective date of this 14amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly, the Board shall 15adopt uniform rules providing for a waiver process for a 16person previously employed and qualified as a law enforcement 17or county corrections officer under federal law or the laws of 18any other state, or who has completed a basic law enforcement 19officer or correctional officer academy who would be qualified 20to be employed as a law enforcement officer or correctional 21officer by the federal government or any other state. These 22rules shall address the process for evaluating prior training 23credit, a description and list of the courses typically 24required for reciprocity candidates to complete prior to 25taking the exam, and a procedure for employers seeking a 26pre-activation determination for a reciprocity training   HB5517- 61 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1waiver. The rules shall provide that any eligible person 2previously trained as a law enforcement or county corrections 3officer under federal law or the laws of any other state shall 4successfully complete the following prior to the approval of a 5waiver:6        (1) a training program or set of coursework approved 7    by the Board on the laws of this State relevant to the 8    duties and training requirements of law enforcement and 9    county correctional officers;10        (2) firearms training; and11        (3) successful passage of the equivalency 12    certification examination. 13    If such training is required and not completed within the 14applicable 6 months, then the officer must forfeit the 15officer's position, or the employing agency must obtain a 16waiver from the Board extending the period for compliance. 17Such waiver shall be issued only for good and justifiable 18reasons, and in no case shall extend more than 90 days beyond 19the initial 6 months. Any hiring agency that fails to train a 20law enforcement officer within this period shall be prohibited 21from employing this individual in a law enforcement capacity 22for one year from the date training was to be completed. If an 23agency again fails to train the individual a second time, the 24agency shall be permanently barred from employing this 25individual in a law enforcement capacity.26    An individual who is not certified by the Board or whose   HB5517- 62 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1certified status is inactive shall not function as a law 2enforcement officer, be assigned the duties of a law 3enforcement officer by an employing agency, or be authorized 4to carry firearms under the authority of the employer, except 5as otherwise authorized to carry a firearm under State or 6federal law. Sheriffs who are elected as of January 1, 2022 7(the effective date of Public Act 101-652) are exempt from the 8requirement of certified status. Failure to be certified in 9accordance with this Act shall cause the officer to forfeit 10the officer's position.11    An employing agency may not grant a person status as a law 12enforcement officer unless the person has been granted an 13active law enforcement officer certification by the Board.14    (b) Inactive status. A person who has an inactive law 15enforcement officer certification has no law enforcement 16authority.17        (1) A law enforcement officer's certification becomes 18    inactive upon termination, resignation, retirement, or 19    separation from the officer's employing law enforcement 20    agency for any reason. The Board shall re-activate a 21    certification upon written application from the law 22    enforcement officer's law enforcement agency that shows 23    the law enforcement officer: (i) has accepted a full-time 24    law enforcement position with that law enforcement agency, 25    (ii) is not the subject of a decertification proceeding, 26    and (iii) meets all other criteria for re-activation   HB5517- 63 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    required by the Board. The Board may also establish 2    special training requirements to be completed as a 3    condition for re-activation.4        The Board shall review a notice for reactivation from 5    a law enforcement agency and provide a response within 30 6    days. The Board may extend this review. A law enforcement 7    officer shall be allowed to be employed as a full-time law 8    enforcement officer while the law enforcement officer 9    reactivation waiver is under review. 10        A law enforcement officer who is refused reactivation 11    or an employing agency of a law enforcement officer who is 12    refused reactivation under this Section may request a 13    hearing in accordance with the hearing procedures as 14    outlined in subsection (h) of Section 6.3 of this Act.15        The Board may refuse to re-activate the certification 16    of a law enforcement officer who was involuntarily 17    terminated for good cause by an employing agency for 18    conduct subject to decertification under this Act or 19    resigned or retired after receiving notice of a law 20    enforcement agency's investigation.21        (2) A law enforcement agency may place an officer who 22    is currently certified on inactive status by sending a 23    written request to the Board. A law enforcement officer 24    whose certificate has been placed on inactive status shall 25    not function as a law enforcement officer until the 26    officer has completed any requirements for reactivating   HB5517- 64 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    the certificate as required by the Board. A request for 2    inactive status in this subsection shall be in writing, 3    accompanied by verifying documentation, and shall be 4    submitted to the Board with a copy to the chief 5    administrator of the law enforcement officer's current or 6    new employing agency.7        (3) Certification that has become inactive under 8    paragraph (2) of this subsection (b) shall be reactivated 9    by written notice from the law enforcement officer's 10    agency upon a showing that the law enforcement officer: 11    (i) is employed in a full-time law enforcement position 12    with the same law enforcement agency, (ii) is not the 13    subject of a decertification proceeding, and (iii) meets 14    all other criteria for re-activation required by the 15    Board.16        (4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of this subsection 17    (b), a law enforcement officer whose certification has 18    become inactive under paragraph (2) may have the officer's 19    employing agency submit a request for a waiver of training 20    requirements to the Board in writing and accompanied by 21    any verifying documentation. A grant of a waiver is within 22    the discretion of the Board. Within 7 days of receiving a 23    request for a waiver under this Section, the Board shall 24    notify the law enforcement officer and the chief 25    administrator of the law enforcement officer's employing 26    agency, whether the request has been granted, denied, or   HB5517- 65 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    if the Board will take additional time for information. A 2    law enforcement agency whose request for a waiver under 3    this subsection is denied is entitled to request a review 4    of the denial by the Board. The law enforcement agency 5    must request a review within 20 days of the waiver being 6    denied. The burden of proof shall be on the law 7    enforcement agency to show why the law enforcement officer 8    is entitled to a waiver of the legislatively required 9    training and eligibility requirements. 10    (c) No provision of this Section shall be construed to 11mean that a county corrections officer employed by a 12governmental agency at the time of the effective date of this 13amendatory Act, either as a probationary county corrections 14officer or as a permanent county corrections officer, shall 15require certification under the provisions of this Section. No 16provision of this Section shall be construed to apply to 17certification of elected county sheriffs.18    (d) Within 14 days, a law enforcement officer shall report 19to the Board: (1) any name change; (2) any change in 20employment; or (3) the filing of any criminal indictment or 21charges against the officer alleging that the officer 22committed any offense as enumerated in Section 6.1 of this 23Act.24    (e) All law enforcement officers must report the 25completion of the training requirements required in this Act 26in compliance with Section 8.4 of this Act.  HB5517- 66 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    (e-1) Each employing law enforcement agency shall allow 2and provide an opportunity for a law enforcement officer to 3complete the mandated requirements in this Act. All mandated 4training shall be provided at no cost to the employees. 5Employees shall be paid for all time spent attending mandated 6training. 7    (e-2) Each agency, academy, or training provider shall 8maintain proof of a law enforcement officer's completion of 9legislatively required training in a format designated by the 10Board. The report of training shall be submitted to the Board 11within 30 days following completion of the training. A copy of 12the report shall be submitted to the law enforcement officer. 13Upon receipt of a properly completed report of training, the 14Board will make the appropriate entry into the training 15records of the law enforcement officer. 16    (f) This Section does not apply to part-time law 17enforcement officers or probationary part-time law enforcement 18officers.19    (g) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 20the changes made to this Section by Public Act 101-652, Public 21Act 102-28, and Public Act 102-694 take effect July 1, 2022. 22    (h) This Section does not apply to elected county 23sheriffs. 24(Source: P.A. 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 25103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-389, eff. 1-1-24.)   HB5517- 67 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    (50 ILCS 705/8.2)2    Sec. 8.2. Part-time law enforcement officers. 3    (a) A person hired to serve as a part-time law enforcement 4officer must obtain from the Board a certificate (i) attesting 5to the officer's successful completion of the part-time police 6training course; (ii) attesting to the officer's satisfactory 7completion of a training program of similar content and number 8of hours that has been found acceptable by the Board under the 9provisions of this Act; or (iii) a training waiver attesting 10to the Board's determination that the part-time police 11training course is unnecessary because of the person's prior 12law enforcement experience obtained in Illinois, in any other 13state, or with an agency of the federal government. A person 14hired on or after March 14, 2002 (the effective date of Public 15Act 92-533) must obtain this certificate within 18 months 16after the initial date of hire as a probationary part-time law 17enforcement officer in the State of Illinois. The probationary 18part-time law enforcement officer must be enrolled and 19accepted into a Board-approved course within 6 months after 20active employment by any department in the State. A person 21hired on or after January 1, 1996 and before March 14, 2002 22(the effective date of Public Act 92-533) must obtain this 23certificate within 18 months after the date of hire. A person 24hired before January 1, 1996 must obtain this certificate 25within 24 months after January 1, 1996 (the effective date of 26Public Act 89-170). Agencies seeking a reciprocity waiver for   HB5517- 68 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1training completed outside of Illinois must conduct a thorough 2background check and provide verification of the officer's 3prior training. After review and satisfaction of all requested 4conditions, the officer shall be awarded an equivalency 5certificate satisfying the requirements of this Section. 6Within 60 days after January 1, 2024 (the effective date of 7Public Act 103-389), the Board shall adopt uniform rules 8providing for a waiver process for a person previously 9employed and qualified as a law enforcement or county 10corrections officer under federal law or the laws of any other 11state, or who has completed a basic law enforcement officer or 12correctional officer academy who would be qualified to be 13employed as a law enforcement officer or correctional officer 14by the federal government or any other state. These rules 15shall address the process for evaluating prior training 16credit, a description and list of the courses typically 17required for reciprocity candidates to complete prior to 18taking the exam, and a procedure for employers seeking a 19pre-activation determination for a reciprocity training 20waiver. The rules shall provide that any eligible person 21previously trained as a law enforcement or county corrections 22officer under federal law or the laws of any other state shall 23successfully complete the following prior to the approval of a 24waiver:25        (1) a training program or set of coursework approved 26    by the Board on the laws of this State relevant to the   HB5517- 69 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    duties and training requirements of law enforcement and 2    county correctional officers;3        (2) firearms training; and4        (3) successful passage of the equivalency 5    certification examination. 6    The employing agency may seek an extension waiver from the 7Board extending the period for compliance. An extension waiver 8shall be issued only for good and justifiable reasons, and the 9probationary part-time law enforcement officer may not 10practice as a part-time law enforcement officer during the 11extension waiver period. If training is required and not 12completed within the applicable time period, as extended by 13any waiver that may be granted, then the officer must forfeit 14the officer's position.15    An individual who is not certified by the Board or whose 16certified status is inactive shall not function as a law 17enforcement officer, be assigned the duties of a law 18enforcement officer by an agency, or be authorized to carry 19firearms under the authority of the employer, except that 20sheriffs who are elected are exempt from the requirement of 21certified status. Failure to be in accordance with this Act 22shall cause the officer to forfeit the officer's position.23    (a-5) A part-time probationary law enforcement officer 24shall be allowed to complete 6 months of a part-time police 25training course and function as a law enforcement officer as 26permitted by this subsection with a waiver from the Board,   HB5517- 70 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1provided the part-time law enforcement officer is still 2enrolled in the training course. If the part-time probationary 3law enforcement officer withdraws from the course for any 4reason or does not complete the course within the applicable 5time period, as extended by any waiver that may be granted, 6then the officer must forfeit the officer's position. A 7probationary law enforcement officer must function under the 8following rules: 9        (1) A law enforcement agency may not grant a person 10    status as a law enforcement officer unless the person has 11    been granted an active law enforcement officer 12    certification by the Board. 13        (2) A part-time probationary law enforcement officer 14    shall not be used as a permanent replacement for a 15    full-time law enforcement officer.16        (3) A part-time probationary law enforcement officer 17    shall be directly supervised at all times by a 18    Board-certified law enforcement officer. Direct 19    supervision requires oversight and control with the 20    supervisor having final decision-making authority as to 21    the actions of the recruit during duty hours. 22    (b) Inactive status. A person who has an inactive law 23enforcement officer certification has no law enforcement 24authority.25        (1) A law enforcement officer's certification becomes 26    inactive upon termination, resignation, retirement, or   HB5517- 71 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    separation from the employing agency for any reason. The 2    Board shall reactivate a certification upon written 3    application from the law enforcement officer's employing 4    agency that shows the law enforcement officer: (i) has 5    accepted a part-time law enforcement position with that a 6    law enforcement agency, (ii) is not the subject of a 7    decertification proceeding, and (iii) meets all other 8    criteria for reactivation required by the Board.9        The Board may refuse to reactivate the certification 10    of a law enforcement officer who was involuntarily 11    terminated for good cause by the officer's employing 12    agency for conduct subject to decertification under this 13    Act or resigned or retired after receiving notice of a law 14    enforcement agency's investigation.15        (2) A law enforcement agency may place an officer who 16    is currently certified on inactive status by sending a 17    written request to the Board. A law enforcement officer 18    whose certificate has been placed on inactive status shall 19    not function as a law enforcement officer until the 20    officer has completed any requirements for reactivating 21    the certificate as required by the Board. A request for 22    inactive status in this subsection shall be in writing, 23    accompanied by verifying documentation, and shall be 24    submitted to the Board by the law enforcement officer's 25    employing agency.26        (3) Certification that has become inactive under   HB5517- 72 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    paragraph (2) of this subsection (b) shall be reactivated 2    by written notice from the law enforcement officer's law 3    enforcement agency upon a showing that the law enforcement 4    officer is: (i) employed in a part-time law enforcement 5    position with the same law enforcement agency, (ii) not 6    the subject of a decertification proceeding, and (iii) 7    meets all other criteria for reactivation required by the 8    Board. The Board may also establish special training 9    requirements to be completed as a condition for 10    reactivation. 11        The Board shall review a notice for reactivation from 12    a law enforcement agency and provide a response within 30 13    days. The Board may extend this review. A law enforcement 14    officer shall be allowed to be employed as a part-time law 15    enforcement officer while the law enforcement officer 16    reactivation waiver is under review. 17        A law enforcement officer who is refused reactivation 18    or an employing agency of a law enforcement officer who is 19    refused reactivation under this Section may request a 20    hearing in accordance with the hearing procedures as 21    outlined in subsection (h) of Section 6.3 of this Act.22        (4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of this Section, a 23    law enforcement officer whose certification has become 24    inactive under paragraph (2) may have the officer's 25    employing agency submit a request for a waiver of training 26    requirements to the Board in writing and accompanied by   HB5517- 73 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    any verifying documentation. A grant of a waiver is within 2    the discretion of the Board. Within 7 days of receiving a 3    request for a waiver under this section, the Board shall 4    notify the law enforcement officer and the chief 5    administrator of the law enforcement officer's employing 6    agency, whether the request has been granted, denied, or 7    if the Board will take additional time for information. A 8    law enforcement agency or law enforcement officer, whose 9    request for a waiver under this subsection is denied, is 10    entitled to request a review of the denial by the Board. 11    The law enforcement agency must request a review within 20 12    days after the waiver being denied. The burden of proof 13    shall be on the law enforcement agency to show why the law 14    enforcement officer is entitled to a waiver of the 15    legislatively required training and eligibility 16    requirements. 17    (c) The part-time police training course referred to in 18this Section shall be of similar content and the same number of 19hours as the courses for full-time officers and shall be 20provided by Mobile Team In-Service Training Units under the 21Intergovernmental Law Enforcement Officer's In-Service 22Training Act or by another approved program or facility in a 23manner prescribed by the Board.24    (d) Within 14 days, a law enforcement officer shall report 25to the Board: (1) any name change; (2) any change in 26employment; or (3) the filing of any criminal indictment or   HB5517- 74 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1charges against the officer alleging that the officer 2committed any offense as enumerated in Section 6.1 of this 3Act.4    (e) All law enforcement officers must report the 5completion of the training requirements required in this Act 6in compliance with Section 8.4 of this Act.7    (e-1) Each employing agency shall allow and provide an 8opportunity for a law enforcement officer to complete the 9requirements in this Act. All mandated training shall be 10provided for at no cost to the employees. Employees shall be 11paid for all time spent attending mandated training. 12    (e-2) Each agency, academy, or training provider shall 13maintain proof of a law enforcement officer's completion of 14legislatively required training in a format designated by the 15Board. The report of training shall be submitted to the Board 16within 30 days following completion of the training. A copy of 17the report shall be submitted to the law enforcement officer. 18Upon receipt of a properly completed report of training, the 19Board will make the appropriate entry into the training 20records of the law enforcement officer. 21    (f) For the purposes of this Section, the Board shall 22adopt rules defining what constitutes employment on a 23part-time basis.24    (g) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 25the changes made to this Section by Public Act 102-694 and 26Public Act 101-652 take effect July 1, 2022.   HB5517- 75 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    (h) This Section does not apply to elected county 2sheriffs. 3(Source: P.A. 103-389, eff. 1-1-24; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 4    (50 ILCS 705/8.3)5    Sec. 8.3. Emergency order of suspension.6    (a) The Board, upon being notified that a law enforcement 7officer has been arrested or indicted on any felony charge or 8charges, may immediately suspend the law enforcement officer's 9certification for a term specified by the Board to begin no 10sooner than the date of the violation. The Board shall also 11notify the sheriff or chief executive officer administrator of 12the any law enforcement agency currently employing the 13officer. The Board shall have authority to dissolve an 14emergency order of suspension at any time for any reason.15    (a-5) The Board may consider the following factors in 16determining the term of an emergency order of a suspension:17        (1) the seriousness of the conduct resulting in the 18    arrest;19        (2) whether the offense contains an element of actual 20    or threatened bodily injury or coerce against another 21    person;22        (3) the law enforcement officer's previous arrests;23        (4) the law enforcement officer's previous 24    certification suspensions;25        (5) actual or potential harm to public safety; and  HB5517- 76 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1        (6) rebuttal evidence regarding mitigating factors. 2    (b) Notice of the immediate suspension shall be served on 3the law enforcement officer, the sheriff or employing agency, 4and the chief executive of the employing agency within 7 days, 5and the notice must state the reason for suspension within 6seven days. The law enforcement officer shall be served by 7personal delivery, by certified mail at their address of 8record, or by a trackable courier service with signature 9requirement. 10    (c) Upon service of the notice, the law enforcement 11officer or the law enforcement officer's employing agency 12shall have 30 days to request a hearing with to be heard by the 13Panel to review an emergency order of suspension. The hearing, 14if requested by the officer, shall follow the hearing 15procedures as outlined in subsection (h) of Section 6.3 of 16this Act. At In the hearing, the written communication and any 17other evidence obtained therewith may be introduced as 18evidence against the law enforcement officer; provided 19however, the law enforcement officer, or their counsel, shall 20have the opportunity to discredit, impeach and submit evidence 21rebutting such evidence to explain why the officer's 22certification should not be suspended or why the suspension 23should be shortened. The law enforcement officer may also 24present mitigating any rebuttal evidence in rebuttal of 25mitigating factors. 26    (d) At the conclusion of the hearing, the administrative   HB5517- 77 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1law judge shall provide a recommendation to the Panel 2regarding whether the emergency order of suspension should 3remain in place, be amended, or be rescinded. The Panel shall 4review the recommendation from the administrative law judge 5regarding the suspension, and if the Panel finds that the 6proof is evident or the presumption great that the officer has 7committed the offense charged, the Panel may can sustain or 8reduce the length of the suspension. If the Panel does not find 9that the proof is evident or the presumption great that the 10officer has committed the offense charged, the Panel may 11rescind the emergency order of can reverse the suspension.12    If the law enforcement officer does not request to be 13heard or does not appear, the Panel may hold the hearing in the 14officer's absence. The law enforcement officer and the 15employing agency shall be notified of the Panel's decision of 16the Panel within 7 days. The law enforcement officer may 17request to suspend the hearing until after the officer's 18criminal trial has occurred, however the suspension will 19remain intact until the hearing.20    (e) Findings and conclusions made by the administrative 21law judge or the Panel based on evidence presented at a in 22hearing related to for an emergency order of suspension shall 23not be binding on any party in any subsequent proceeding under 24this Act.25    (f) A Panel member acting in good faith, and not in a 26willful and wanton manner, in accordance with this Section,   HB5517- 78 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1shall not, as a result of such actions, be subject to criminal 2prosecution or civil damages, including, but not limited to, 3lost wages.4    (g) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 5the changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of the 6102nd General Assembly and Public Act 101-652 take effect July 71, 2022. 8(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-22; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22.) 9    (50 ILCS 705/9.2)10    Sec. 9.2. Officer professional conduct database; 11transparency.12    (a) A All law enforcement agency, including agencies and 13the Illinois State Police, shall notify the Board of any final 14determination of a sustained willful violation of department, 15agency, or the Illinois State Police policy that includes 16assault, sexual assault, bribery, coercion, fraud, theft, 17untruthfulness, bias, or excessive force. A law enforcement 18agency and the Illinois State Police shall notify the Board of 19a sustained willful violation of a department, agency, or 20Illinois State Police policy if the conduct constitutes a 21significant abuse of the public trust, if the conduct reflects 22an unfitness to serve, or if the conduct is covered by Section 236.3 and results in a suspension of at least 10 days. The 24notification shall occur no later than 10 days after a final 25determination and final exhaustion of any administrative   HB5517- 79 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1appeal or challenge to discipline under a collective 2bargaining agreement. , official misconduct, or violation of 3law within 10 days when:4    (a-5) A law enforcement agency and the Illinois State 5Police shall notify the Board when an officer is discharged or 6dismissed because of a sustained violation of a department, 7agency, or Illinois State Police policy that includes assault, 8sexual assault, bribery, coercion, fraud, theft, 9untruthfulness, bias, excessive force, conduct that 10constitutes a significant abuse of the public trust, or 11reflects an unfitness to serve, or any other conduct covered 12by Section 6.3. The agency shall provide information regarding 13the nature of the violation. The notification shall occur as 14soon as the officer is discharged or dismissed. 15    (a-10) If a law enforcement officer has been served notice 16that the officer is the accused in an ongoing disciplinary 17investigation and if the officer resigns or retires before the 18investigation is concluded or terminated, the law enforcement 19agency, including the Illinois State Police, shall notify the 20Board as soon as the officer resigns or retires if the conduct 21that is the subject of the ongoing disciplinary investigation: 22        (1) would trigger a notice of alleged violation under 23    6.3 of this Act or automatic decertification under 6.2a of 24    this Act; 25        (2) constitutes a significant abuse of the public 26    trust or reflects an unfitness to serve; or   HB5517- 80 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1        (3) involves an allegation that the law enforcement 2    officer committed perjury, intentionally made a false 3    statement, or knowingly tampered with or fabricated 4    evidence. 5        (1) the determination leads to a suspension of at 6    least 10 days;7        (2) any infraction that would trigger an official or 8    formal investigation under a law enforcement agency or the 9    Illinois State Police policy;10        (3) there is an allegation of misconduct or regarding 11    truthfulness as to a material fact, bias, or integrity; or12        (4) the officer resigns or retires during the course 13    of an investigation and the officer has been served notice 14    that the officer is under investigation.15    Nothing in this Section prohibits law enforcement agencies 16Agencies and the Illinois State Police from truthfully and 17accurately reporting may report to another agency the Board 18any conduct they deem appropriate to disseminate to another 19law enforcement agency regarding a law enforcement officer.20    The agency or the Illinois State Police shall report to 21the Board within 10 days of a final determination and final 22exhaustion of any administrative appeal, or the law 23enforcement officer's resignation or retirement, and shall 24provide information regarding the nature of the violation. 25This notification shall not necessarily trigger certification 26review.  HB5517- 81 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    A law enforcement agency and the Illinois State Police 2shall be immune from liability for a disclosure made as 3described in this subsection, unless the disclosure would 4constitute intentional misrepresentation or gross negligence.5    (b) Within 14 days after receiving notification from a law 6enforcement agency or the Illinois State Police, the Board 7must notify the law enforcement officer of the report and the 8officer's right to provide a statement regarding the reported 9violation. The law enforcement officer shall be served by 10personal delivery, by certified mail at their address of 11record, or by a trackable courier service with signature 12requirement. The law enforcement officer shall have 14 days 13from receiving notice to provide a written objection 14contesting information included in the agency's report. The 15objection must be filed with the Board on a form prescribed by 16the Board, and a copy must be served on the law enforcement 17agency. The objection shall remain in the database with the 18reported violation. 19        (1) After the Board receives an objection from a law 20    enforcement officer, the Board must request a response 21    from the law enforcement agency. The law enforcement 22    agency may choose to maintain, amend, or rescind the 23    report.24        (2) A report sustained by the law enforcement agency 25    shall remain in the database and be accompanied by the 26    objection filed by the officer. A report amended by the   HB5517- 82 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    filing law enforcement agency shall be updated by the 2    Board. A report that has been rescinded by the agency 3    shall be removed from the Officer Professional Conduct 4    Database. The Board shall not use a rescinded report for 5    reactivation decisions.6        (3) At any time, the Board may add additional 7    information submitted by a law enforcement officer 8    regarding newly discovered evidence or a new decision from 9    an appeal or challenge to discipline pursuant to a 10    collective bargaining agreement. A law enforcement agency 11    may also request the retraction of a report that was made 12    in error. 13     (c) The Board shall maintain a database readily available 14to any chief executive administrative officer of a law 15enforcement agency, a sheriff, or the officer's designee of a 16sheriff or chief executive officer , of a law enforcement 17agency and to the Illinois State Police, which that shall show 18for each law enforcement officer: (i) dates of certification, 19decertification, and inactive status; (ii) any information 20submitted under subsections (a), (b), and (c) of Section 9.2 21each sustained instance of departmental misconduct that lead 22to a suspension at least 10 days or any infraction that would 23trigger an official or formal investigation under the law 24enforcement agency policy, any allegation of misconduct 25regarding truthfulness as to a material fact, bias, or 26integrity, or any other reported violation, the nature of the   HB5517- 83 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1violation, the reason for the final decision of discharge or 2dismissal, and any statement provided by the officer; (iii) 3date of separation from employment from any local or state law 4enforcement agency; and (iv) the reason for separation from 5employment, including, but not limited to: whether the 6separation was based on misconduct or occurred while the law 7enforcement agency was conducting an investigation of the 8certified individual for a violation of an employing agency's 9rules, policy or procedure or other misconduct or improper 10action. This database shall be known as the Officer 11Professional Conduct Database. 12        (1) This database shall also be accessible to the 13    State's Attorney of any county in this State and the 14    Attorney General for the purpose of complying with 15    obligations under Brady v. Maryland (373 U.S. 83) or 16    Giglio v. United States (405 U.S. 150). This database 17    shall also be accessible to the sheriff or chief executive 18    administrative officer of any law enforcement agency for 19    the purposes of hiring law enforcement officers. This 20    database shall not be accessible to anyone not listed in 21    this subsection.22        (2) Before a law enforcement agency may appoint a law 23    enforcement officer or a person seeking a certification as 24    a law enforcement officer in this State, the chief 25    administrative officer or designee must check the Officer 26    Professional Conduct Database, contact each person's   HB5517- 84 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    previous law enforcement employers, and document the 2    contact. This documentation must be available for review 3    by the Board for a minimum of five years after the law 4    enforcement officer's termination, retirement, 5    resignation or separation with that agency.6        (3) The database, documents, materials, or other 7    information in the possession or control of the Board that 8    are obtained by or disclosed to the Board under this 9    subsection shall be confidential by law and privileged, 10    shall not be subject to subpoena, and shall not be subject 11    to discovery or admissible in evidence in any private 12    civil action when sought from the Board. However, the 13    Board is authorized to use such documents, materials, or 14    other information in furtherance of any regulatory or 15    legal action brought as part of the Board's official 16    duties. The Board shall not disclose the database or make 17    such documents, materials, or other information it has 18    obtained or that has been disclosed to it to the public. 19    Neither the Board nor any person who received documents, 20    materials or other information shared under this 21    subsection shall be required to testify in any private 22    civil action concerning the database or any confidential 23    documents, materials, or information subject to this 24    subsection. Unless compelled by law, persons and entities 25    with access to this database shall not further disclose to 26    any other person or entity any information gathered from   HB5517- 85 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    the database. 2     (d) (Blank). The Board shall maintain a searchable 3database of law enforcement officers accessible to the public 4that shall include: (i) the law enforcement officer's 5employing agency; (ii) the date of the officer's initial 6certification and the officer's current certification status; 7and (iii) any sustained complaint of misconduct that resulted 8in decertification and the date thereof; provided, however, 9that information shall not be included in the database that 10would allow the public to ascertain the home address of an 11officer or another person; provided further, that information 12regarding an officer's or another person's family member shall 13not be included in the database. The Board shall make the 14database publicly available on its website. 15     (e) (Blank). The Board shall maintain a searchable 16database of all completed investigations against law 17enforcement officers related to decertification. The database 18shall identify each law enforcement officer by a confidential 19and anonymous number and include: (i) the law enforcement 20officer's employing agency; (ii) the date of the incident 21referenced in the complaint; (iii) the location of the 22incident; (iv) the race and ethnicity of each officer involved 23in the incident; (v) the age, gender, race and ethnicity of 24each person involved in the incident, if known; (vi) whether a 25person in the complaint, including a law enforcement officer, 26was injured, received emergency medical care, was hospitalized   HB5517- 86 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1or died as a result of the incident; (vii) the law enforcement 2agency or other entity assigned to conduct an investigation of 3the incident; (viii) when the investigation was completed; 4(ix) whether the complaint was sustained; and (x) the type of 5misconduct investigated; provided, however, that the Board 6shall redact or withhold such information as necessary to 7prevent the disclosure of the identity of an officer. The 8Board shall make the database publicly available on its 9website. 10     (e-1) (Blank). An investigation is complete when the 11investigation has either been terminated or the 12decertification action, including the administrative review 13process, has been completed, whichever is later.14     (e-2) (Blank). At any time, a law enforcement officer 15shall have access to the law enforcement officer's own records 16on file with the Board, as it pertains to the databases in this 17Section. 18    (f) (Blank). Annual report. The Board shall submit an 19annual report to the Governor, Attorney General, President and 20Minority Leader of the Senate, and the Speaker and Minority 21Leader of the House of Representatives on or before March 1, 222023, and every year thereafter indicating:23        (1) the number of complaints received in the preceding 24    calendar year, including but not limited to the race, 25    gender, and type of discretionary decertification 26    complaints received;  HB5517- 87 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1        (2) the number of investigations initiated in the 2    preceding calendar year since the date of the last report;3        (3) the number of investigations concluded in the 4    preceding calendar year;5        (4) the number of investigations pending as of the 6    last date of the preceding calendar year;7        (5) the number of hearings held in the preceding 8    calendar year; and9        (6) the number of officers decertified in the 10    preceding calendar year.11    The annual report shall be publicly available on the 12website of the Board. 13     (g) Nothing in this Section shall exempt a law 14enforcement agency from which the Board has obtained data, 15documents, materials, or other information or that has 16disclosed data, documents, materials, or other information to 17the Board from disclosing public records in accordance with 18the Freedom of Information Act.19     (h) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 20the changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of the 21102nd General Assembly and Public Act 101-652 take effect July 221, 2022. 23    (i) The Board shall maintain a means of contact, by 24telephone and email, for law enforcement agencies to receive 25timely answers to inquiries regarding submission to the 26database. The Board shall develop and implement an online,   HB5517- 88 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1computer-based training program that must be completed by the 2chief executive officer and one or more law enforcement agency 3employees responsible for submissions to the database to 4educate the chief executive officer and designated employees 5about the database and required submissions to the database.6(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-22; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22.) 7    (50 ILCS 705/9.3 new)8    Sec. 9.3. Officer professional conduct public database9    (a) The Board shall maintain a database of law enforcement 10officers accessible to the public that shall include: (i) the 11law enforcement officer's employing agency; (ii) the date of 12the officer's initial certification and the officer's current 13certification status; and (iii) any sustained complaint of 14misconduct that resulted in decertification and the date 15thereof; provided, however, that information shall not be 16included in the database that would allow the public to 17ascertain the home address of an officer or another person; 18provided further, that information regarding an officer's or 19another person's family member shall not be included in the 20database. The Board shall make the database publicly available 21on its website. The public database shall be searchable and 22exportable in a machine-readable format.23    The Board shall maintain a database of all completed 24investigations against law enforcement officers related to 25decertification. For all complaints, the database shall   HB5517- 89 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1include: (i) the law enforcement officer's employing agency; 2(ii) the date of the incident referenced in the complaint; 3(iii) the location of the incident; (iv) the age, gender, 4race, and ethnicity of each officer involved in the incident; 5(v) the age, gender, race and ethnicity of each person 6involved in the incident, if known; (vi) whether a person in 7the complaint, including a law enforcement officer, was 8injured, received emergency medical care, was hospitalized, or 9died as a result of the incident; (vii) the law enforcement 10agency or other entity assigned to conduct an investigation of 11the incident; (viii) when the investigation was completed; 12(ix) whether the complaint was sustained; (x) the type of 13misconduct investigated; (xi) whether the officer was employed 14on a full-time or part-time basis; and (xii) the hiring and 15separation dates of the officer. The final order and the 16Panel's disposition recommendation shall also be published on 17the Board's website. However, the Board shall redact or 18withhold such information as necessary to prevent the 19disclosure only for any one or more of the following purposes:20        (1) to remove personal data or information, such as a 21    home address, telephone number, email address, social 22    media identifiers or identities of family members, other 23    than the names and employers of law enforcement officers;24        (2) to preserve the anonymity of complainants and 25    witnesses;26        (3) to protect confidential medical, financial, or   HB5517- 90 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1    other information of which disclosure is specifically 2    prohibited by federal law or would cause an unwarranted 3    invasion of personal privacy that clearly outweighs the 4    strong public interest in records about misconduct and 5    serious use of force by peace officers and custodial 6    officers; and7        (4) to protect the physical safety or well-being of a 8    peace officer, custodial officer, or other person when 9    there is a reasonable basis to believe that disclosure of 10    the record would pose a significant danger to the physical 11    safety or well-being of the peace officer, custodial 12    officer, or other person.13    (b) An investigation is complete when the investigation 14has either been terminated or the decertification action, 15including the administrative review process, has been 16completed, whichever is later.17    (c) At any time, a law enforcement officer shall have 18access to the law enforcement officer's own records on file 19with the Board, as it pertains to the databases in this 20Section.21    (d) A law enforcement agency and the Illinois State Police 22shall be immune from liability for a disclosure made under 23this Section, unless the disclosure would constitute 24intentional misrepresentation or gross negligence. 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 26becoming law.  HB5517- 91 -LRB104 17928 RTM 31365 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    50 ILCS 705/2from Ch. 85, par. 5024    50 ILCS 705/3from Ch. 85, par. 5035    50 ILCS 705/3.16    50 ILCS 705/3.3 new7    50 ILCS 705/6from Ch. 85, par. 5068    50 ILCS 705/6.39    50 ILCS 705/6.610    50 ILCS 705/7.111    50 ILCS 705/8from Ch. 85, par. 50812    50 ILCS 705/8.1from Ch. 85, par. 508.113    50 ILCS 705/8.214    50 ILCS 705/8.315    50 ILCS 705/9.216    50 ILCS 705/9.3 new